Yes, somewhere there is a video of her admitting she wasn't serious and it was all a joke or something. 
Only if you don't own property with a sidewalk, or drive, or leave the house, or desire a steady supply of electricity.  Snow requires cold, and cold is not fun.
I'm honoured.  I don't think anyone has ever used one of my pictures as their background before.  Thanks!
my bad
Weird.  But then again I've never smoked one like that.  Have done some pig roasts where we buried the thing over coals, that skin was crispy and delicious!
What the fuck were your parents smoking when they settled on 'Kassem'? 
unofficial rule of every sports league that plays on the mall: +10 points if you hit a guy pretending the monument is his dick or a segway tour.
Yup.  Just Taki on there.
they ask for your phone number because your powerup rewards card is tied to it, that's it. it saves everyone the trouble of having to use their finnicky card readers.
OKAY GUYS HE'S SURE, RETRACT ALL TONGUE-IN-CHEEK COMMENTARY ABOUT BANALITY WITH RESPECT TO NICKELBACK.
I am very tolerant of the religious folks in my life. They are the ones who cut me out for being atheist not me. They also wont talk to my gay brother. How am I being intolerant?  People can believe what they wish...My problem is when those beliefs are pushed into government and education.
Oh, he told the nurse in the room to "bag it up" for me after it was removed. I was just like "throw it away!" and then she literally tossed it in the trashcan. lol.
You don't have to have them be naked... It is children after all, i don't think they'd do that even if it was R just for taboo reasons.  Are they not allowed to show some blood in PG-13? it's not like ender's game was extremely gory. 
Pudding is worth more than the pennies.
First Thought when seeing this: That PC does not have enough air to breathe.
i went to middle school with Kesha Sebert and i've always known this. when she became a "thing" i thought the entire world had gone completely fucking nuts. (oh wait...)
What makes you think that?
He was the best thing on TV when you don't have cable and you're hungover on a weekday. Seriously. How sad.
Yeah and it got annoying at least 5 years ago!
I installed Swype from the beta site a 4-5 hours ago and got pushed an update an hour ago.
I am 24 and I have been illegally and legally drinking since 11 years as well. Also living in good ol Germany!
Thanks for the tip about the '03. I might need to test ride a STriple and a SV for comparison. I doubt the shop will appreciate it though.
What about the chinese?
If anyone is wondering the alt-text is in the 13th one.
&gt;Stop telling young guys they shouldn't take responsibility for their reproductive choices.  He didn't have a choice. That's kinda the problem. She took it from him.
Don't be too shocked. With Paul, you get a steady mix of 'I love liberty, stand by the constitution' with a steady mix of 'Let's protect big business and the very wealthy.' It's a hybrid and a direct result of the Koch Brothers owning the tea party. If you read up on it, you'll notice they were pitching Palin for a long time...paying her to stump for the 'cause' and it was a movement that really did attract the lowest common denominator.  I have nothing against Paul personally but he has done some questionable voting in his short time. And don't forget that the tea party really did create the 'birther' movement and many of those folks are still not convinced that Obama is an American. They have accused him of being muslim, kenyan, marxist, communist, the anit-christ, a witch doctor...the tea party is a lot of things....reasonable, rational and grassroots are things they are not.
Y U NO LIKE?
WHY are you such a shit poster? The article is more informative and less of an obvious appeal to emotion.
"travel show". That's one way to describe it...
Ok buddy, put the match box down and back away from the stack of gasoline soaked papers.
HELL YES. I'm bringing the 5 redditors in my program too!
What is your primary source for purchasing wolf shirts?
&gt;Buying something instead of something else still sells MORE of the prior  Why is that bad? All the brands make +P ammo. Some of the most popular brands (like Critical Defense) aren't even +P. Again, who is getting hurt here?
henry!
Yeah, found it too. YT-1300f that was rebuilt with YT-1300p compartments.
Your loyalty to your captors is touching. In the same vain as your argument, "why dont you just get a better job, you must be lazy. 
nope
[Honorable mention](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WqyKAPTIj4o#t=2m20s)  It's not quite a sword fight, but it's fun to watch.  My favorite bit, [the few seconds where he disarms the thug](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WqyKAPTIj4o#t=3m28s).
Is this in Albuquerque? 
I had a lemonade stand back in 96. No police to ruin it. Made 4 bucks. Was a simpler time
So, if you don't actually have to take a dump, do you just go and sit on the toilet?
Wear dark fitted jeans. Not skin tight, not baggy, both are unflattering. I would say that it definitely matters, if a man has a nice ass I want to see it. Flaunt it :)
Yup, time for some water.
&gt;But from our understanding of the nature of the universe neither of these option seem at all possible.  I'm not sure why you say this.  They are both plausible, are they not?  \#1 would be a larger-scale version of the spontaneous creation of 'virtual' particles which is allowed for in current physics.  And what is wrong with #2?  As I understand it the Big Bang only means that no information about what might've come before could've survived - it doesn't mean there wasn't a cycle beforehand.  I gather that Stephen Hawking is proposing that time began with the Big Bang as well, so that would be a different theory which appears (to me, at least) to have the same problem (or a version thereof) as the one you're posing, but some (Hawking included) don't see a problem there.  &gt;does this not tell us that the way we perceive and understand the universe is under a great misapprehension?   It is perhaps our notions of causality that are faulty - we're certainly rubbing up against the extreme edges of our ideas about cause and effect.
Near the slug?!
[List of moderators for /r/pics](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/about/moderators)  [List of moderators for /r/funny](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/about/moderators)
You are missing the entire point of the hardened pre order sell out;  The only perk to even ordering the hardened edition was the premium elite subscription.  So if 5 million Hardened preorders sold (making that number up, I don't know for sure) then at the absolute LEAST 5 million were going to try to sign in on release day.  And that is if nobody with the regular edition even tries to log in.
Good at memorization and playing back what he's been told. 
well you are right about the drugged and tortured part. well we did do the drugged part in the past, and its possible drugging prisoners before interogation is happening now. however raping i highly doubt, women are rarely captured. 
Who the fuck is this wack job?  Does he actually have an audience.
Borlaug probably worships Mendel
Why is this in the atheism section? lol 
Added, steam name is [VG] Grey Fox
&gt; I could probably have my mortgage paid off by the end of next year. I'll have to decide whether it's better to keep that in the markets or eliminate the moderately low interest mortgage.  Personally I'd pay the mortgage off. Outstanding debt is "risk." Always plan for the worst case scenario and hope for the best. Assuming you do not pay off the house and you get laid off for a year? Would you want the house paid off or would you rather have invested that money and still have a house payment that you now have to raid your investments to pay?  Sounds like you know what you are doing though :)
Mr. Scott! How ya been sir?  What were you looking for in terms of a trade? I'd like to start collecting these bad boys.
That is true.   I'm sure that unlike most cigarettes, they also contain it in large amounts.
Look at that subtle off-white coloring. The tasteful thickness of it.
You're either a bastard or a blowhard. Choose one.
It didn't work out so well for that dude in Norway. &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;  Try the gym? 
How am I writing any of that off?  Its often the details that separate pros from semi pros.  Performing to your full potential regardless of the circumstances is just as important as having that potential in the first place.  
9-40... I almost feel a little bad for them. Almost.
actually it was phil spector who made the wall of sound
It's not uncommon for real abortion services providers to not list their clinics under "abortion services" for obvious reasons. It's often not unusual for areas to have no real abortion services due to the continued war against the legal rights to obtain abortions.  However, the despicable anti-abortion, religiously funded fake abortion consulting clinics have no such compunction.  It's just Siri finding the published results. 
people have to vote ASAD
BRING BACK SNACKS!
Rest in Peace little Mayito. He was loved in the end and that is so wonderful. thank you for trying to save him but most of all thank you for letting his last days being in comfort safety and love.
Oak has lotsa pores.  You can combine an oil based paste wood filler with a bit of stain and work that stuff in like nobody's business. Slather it on and watch it get sucked into those tiny holes.  Then wipe it off.  Elbow grease aplenty!  Let dry completely.  The payoff is that when you put finish on it you'll get a nice smooth surface like a bowling alley.  Without the fill, you'll get little pinholes. Oh and keep brewing!
Whoa no way, me too.
I much prefer your ameteurish shots, thanks for posting your sexiness.   :D
No I opted for the cheap route. I drilled a hole in the inside ceiling of the car (not all the way through to the outside - that causes rusting) and put a handheld digital camera on a home-made mounting bracket. Was the best I could do considering my financial condition at the time. I also had a power inverter for the camera to plug into.
Mind. BLOWN.
So... much... cobble...
You want brostep? You're looking for Hulk
The front of my building is glass and there are two separate glass door entrances, they pay someone to open the doors for us as we enter / leave and take it pretty serious. As I get off the elevator, he's already spotting which door I'm heading to, and starts walking down there, I immediately tilt my head slightly to the other door and he switches directions, I do this about 2-3 times before I finally get to the door and scoff, "uh thanks" when I beat him to it.
Could you possibly explain your response? I'm completely baffled by it. 
[](/absmile)Ahm a **BLANK FLANK**.
&gt;In both cases, because they were not US Citizens.  The Jews were citizens of the Germany that sent them to the camps, first of all. Second of all, are you saying that it is acceptable for government to commit atrocities on people and give them no protections whatsoever, so long as those people are not citizens? You initially said that people could change their state of involuntary servitude or genocide victim by "writing to their Senators," but then say that they are unable to do this if they are not citizens. In what society do you imagine slaves would be given voting rights?   Your whole second segment here is quite terrifying. You seem to be saying that whatever the majority votes in as a law, you are willing to accept it (you might agitate against it, perhaps by protesting?) and would not consider it criminal or untenable by the government -- which has no concern about what you find "morally repugnant." Let me ask you then -- what if the law concerned you? What if you and your family were the victims of the law enslaving you or killing you? Would you simply send your children to the gas chambers, head held high in the knowledge that the majority of people voted for this so therefore they must have the right to do this?   For the record, many foreign powers have issue with our stance on human rights. This is such a revealing comment by you because it implies, again, that you are extremely concerned with what the majority of others think -- in this case foreign powers -- rather than what you yourself believe to be right. Much of the Arab world, for example, is repulsed by the U.S. stance on a variety of issues, the Chinese, with well over a billion people, as well. Do you feel it's time to seek asylum in one of those areas? If not, why not?   In your third section, you respond to my response by asking the same question I responded to. Why are human beings influenced by image? I don't know. I presume you feel that you and those people you respect are quite above being influenced by image and are better/more educated/more highly evolved than the rest of us peons who are mere "sheeple." Even if that were true, the fact is that -- apart from you and your higher-order of human friends -- human nature will not change because you want it to. Assuming that you can change the way people behave and think by making laws to create the effects you want only creates perverse incentives and unintended consequences, as I pointed out in my previous comment. You cannot change human nature.   Your fourth section seems, again, to be reiterating points I thought we put to bed earlier in this discussion. Yes, I cannot have a country on my own. I do, however, have rights on my own. Those rights cannot properly be violated merely because a large number of people vote that they should. Saying we are all in this together is meaningless: if 10 men vote to rape a woman, can they simply say to her: "hey, we're all in this together, it's a group decision!"? They do not have the right to violate her, regardless of how many of them vote to do so. Telling her that she can't "opt out" seems callous and not the kind of society that I would want to live in.  Your request that I cite examples of corporations that have gone out of business as a result of union pressures is irrelevant to my point, but I could point to the recent bankruptcy filing of American Airlines, in which they specifically cited union costs as a deciding factor, or the collapse of Pan American airlines, etc. Of course, unions are not generally the sole deciding factor in these bankruptcies, but they certainly help. All that said, it does not address my point to you: governments do not have the same tools to negotiate with unions as corporations do, and governments are not negotiating with their own money, so they lack the proper incentives. Do you disagree with those statements?  My solution to corrupt government "enforcers" of its own laws is to get rid of the government entirely from those areas. Government will always tend toward corruption, it has no reason not to. As Friedrich Hayek said: "In government, the scum rises to the top."  I don't know what the whole thing about the $2,500 is about, I'm sorry. I don't get the reference.  As for the elected officials and their relationships with union bosses -- I have no doubt these are valuable to both the politicians and the bosses. Remember that "governments" do not exist -- they are simply organizations of humans, like you and me, who will do what's in their own best interests. Usually that means paying off their friends with other people's money and not worrying too much about "ethics." Why should they? There's no consequence for doing the wrong thing unless you really screw up. I don't follow your point about whims, I'm sorry.  When people embezzle money from corporations that corporation goes out of business. When people embezzle money from the government, it simply takes more money from the people in taxes and continues right on going. Maybe the embezzlers get caught, but taxpayers are still left holding the bag. For example: in the bank bailouts, the government paid off bankers who effectively lied to everyone with money they took from you and me. You can blame the bankers, but they were just acting in their own interests, because the government guaranteed their bad loans, and paid them off exactly as it said it would. Who is at fault there more, the bankers, or the corrupt politicians who enabled them?   If you'd like an instructive look at union corruption, watch Season 2 of The Wire. It's a great show, you won't be disappointed, and will be especially interested by the realism, I'm sure. Hell, watch the entire show, it's a case study in inept and corrupt governance.  Unions hurt non-workers the same way price controls hurt those things outside their control in general. Unions are simply a cartel for labor, identical to a cartel for any other good, like oil. They artificially limit the market for labor by forcing companies only to hire labor that they approve, much as OPEC artificially increases the price of oil by intentionally limiting the supply. If you are in the union, this is great: you get paid more per job. But there is no such thing as a free lunch. That extra money means people must pay more for the goods that the company produces (the company will simply pass on the union costs to its customers), and that it will be easily outcompeted by a company (say in Mexico, China or India) that does not have union fees to worry about (this is a major reason almost all manufacturing jobs have left to go overseas or at least to right-to-work states). But more importantly, the union laborers recover this fee by making it impossible for non-union workers to get a job. If these non-union workers were part of the viable workforce, the company could hire more workers for less money, thus reducing the cost of the good to its normal, market value, just as if OPEC released all the oil it produced. Unions do not improve conditions across the board, unless you consider being unemployed or forced to work a job that pays you less than you could earn were you allowed in the union to be an improvement. 
Liru proved it was fake.   http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/mrb6t/iama_i_am_the_cop_who_gave_the_dog_a_speeding/c33gls5
yes, which is good, and you are completely right. however, it does not erase years of fucked up-ness, and Burke had more than his fair share of house cleaning. but alas, we are on the road to recovery, and i would be foolish to say things are even slightly as fucked up as before (but i could still go on for *hours*!)
funny enough I posted this a week ago. Good video though. 
Hayek's theory involved over investment in capital goods, which obviously houses are not (although i have seen Austrians attempt to redefine houses as capital goods to defend Hayek when even he admitted defeat).  This blog post goes over it:http://socialdemocracy21stcentury.blogspot.com/2011/10/abct-and-flow-of-credit.html  Specifically, "You see, that’s another point where I thought too much in what was true under prewar conditions, when all credit expansion, or nearly all, went into private investment, into a combination of industrial capital. Since then, so much of the credit expansion has gone to where government directed it that the misdirection may no longer be overinvestment in industrial capital, but may take any number of forms. You must really study it separately for each particular phase and situation. *The typical trade cycle no longer exists, I believe.* But you get very similar phenomena with all kinds of modifications.” (Nobel Prize-Winning Economist: Friedrich A. von Hayek, pp. 184–186). "
Something vague, but back then I couldn't be bothered, I was following The Knack on tour.
What labs would those be?  I've got an engineering degree and have some trade qualifications from a technical school as well and I did more hands on stuff in 3 months there than I did in 4 years as an undergrad mechanical engineer.  
[MENDOOOOOZA!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=o02835c-_vI) Sorry, couldn't resist :)  To keep it relevant - Caterham have the country as "MAL" - is that the Maldives?  Tax dodge?
I was at a friend's surprise party this spring. The party was on April Fools Day and it was a lesbian themed party. My friend is a straight male.   So, the surprise goes off awesomely and games and tokes start everywhere.   At one point I was sitting on the couch by the front door with a friend talking metal vs blues and this tall metalhead in a gorilla mask walks up and starts talking to my friend. Apparently they now each other through their jobs. I meet Gorilla Man, shake his hand and went to get some cake.   Later still, I see Gorilla Man sans mask. Fucking hell he was hot. Tall, Ginger metalhead in big black boots, bullet belt and is covered in awesome Satanic and death tattoos.   I had to talk to this man.  What followed was possibly the best conversation I have ever had with a stranger. What clinched it for me was his name. I'm not going to tell you all what his name is, for obvious reasons. But, let's just say that it was extremely unique and suited him like nothing I had ever seen.  We "dated" for nine month and then it ended suddenly when things got super serious emotionally. Neither of us are capable of that kind of emotion at this point.   Still, I think of our meeting as one of the best things that has ever happened to me.
*Former?*  I still have a couple.
wait...so that means dead people can fuck like a motherfucker!!! *grabs shovel*
Linksmai!
Sooo...you're saying r/atheism believes carlsagansghost is lying about personally never having met a person seriously into theology that didn't believe in evolution?
I learnt how to sprint at level 27 or so. FML.
I'm guessing sheon' understand a lot of things.
The amount of control the deck have would be unreal.
:)
No, the man has a point. Acctually, I think we should go further: The real price should be the square root of what it is labeled.We could also show the price in graphs and equations.  You know, not having unnecessary problems and faulty logic = Being spoiled ;)
What is your favorite TV show? Favorite movies and/or movie genre? 
Shadowmere and I single-handedly slaughtered an entire fort of Imperials. It was mind-blowing. He basically went berserk and started running all over the fort slaying fools, but eventually we were standing in the middle of a courtyard with about 10 Imperials surrounding us at all times. It was like a martial arts film fight scene. We stood in the middle, they came, and we conquered. 
Out of curiosity should we buy pvp gear now or wait a week?
I know this is a crazy suggestion.. and it may not even be physically possible. (I've never observed anyone actually doing it)... but I'll throw it out there anyway.  Clearly communicate your intentions verbally.  Say something like, "I really like hanging out with you and want to be friends, but I'm not interested in taking it further than that."   ... an idea so crazy, it just might work.
Also, "Is Bottled Water Subjected to Higher Health Standards than Bottled Water?"  WAT.
pussshift. The other word with three consecutive consonants.
Great Video!
everyone has a right to pee. now we just need secondary sewage treatment...
Looking for "Social Network"? I think you mean Michael Cera.
But if it gets reclassified, who are the Feds going to be able to raid and ~~steal from~~ *seize assets from* when they need more money?
Awwww its soo cute! I found a baby bird one time that was rejected and covered in ants, so i put gloves on and fed him worms.About 3 weeks later he flew away, but still hangs out by my house!Good of you to do that!
Holy shit I can't believe someone responded to a Request...
Seriously though, go listen to pretty lights right now.  Everything he's released is free on his site.
&gt;People who say gameplay over graphics are full of shit.   I think it helps to define what it means to have "good" graphics.  I think a game can be immediately crippled by bad gameplay, whereas graphics are a bit more subjective unless you're talking about things such as draw distance (as you say).  For example, I would say without hesitation that Final Fantasy 6 is a better game than Final Fantasy 10, and that's not even putting the games into historical perspective.  And Braid?  It blows a game like Rage clear out of the water when we're talking about overall gaming experience.  But I think Braid and FF6 both have great graphics.  They're not technically impressive by any means (the latter might have been back when it was first released), but since when does that matter?  Art style and gameplay go hand in hand, whereas technological capabilities are sort of a different story. Red Dead Redemption probably wouldn't have been created had the technology not been in place to do so, so having the technology allows developers to do *new* things with gameplay.  However, it certainly doesn't necessarily allow them to do *better* things as we see time and time again, and there's still plenty to be explored from old technology as the indie developers out there continue to demonstrate.
How'd you do against him? haha
[Jump to 1:28](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tW9k44sDctI)
True story. Probably, hands down, the best birthday I've ever had.  YAY REDDIT.
Are these councils being elected? I doubt they're appointed by anyone.   Why are the people of the town, who must have SOME idea of how much aid they are getting, allowing their funds to be mismanaged so horribly? I don't think the people running the town (possibly no one at all) know how to manage that much money. Many citizens have probably never left the town and don't have a clue what it's really like outside of their bubble. Has anyone taught them the skills to be able to run a town of 2800 people?   Natives don't want the government all up in their shit most of the time so the government THROWS money at them. I think Native Affairs is one of the biggest budget items (clearly it's working..). Sure, we'll give you the money you need and we'll allow you to keep your culture and your schools and you can use the money yourself to make your town better. Then, when they completely, utterly fail in that and only after the situation has become horrific do they ask for help.  The truth is that so many reserves and native homelands are in the middle of nowhere. They have no chance of succeeding. I don't think it's right, for the people living in these places, to demand that the government spend an obscene amount of money improving a town that 1) only houses a couple hundred/thousand people, 2) is quite far from civilization, 3) has no business/business opportunities. You're choosing to continue living there. There have been billions of dollars given to the Natives over the years and clearly, the infrastructure of their communities doesn't seem to be improving.   Maybe it's time to cut them off or give them a buy out. Here is XX dollars. This is it. This is enough to relocate, give you time to find a job, survive on for a bit.. whatever. Don't feel qualified for a job in your new town? Here. Pick something and go to school for it. But this is it. Yes, we stole your lands. (Well, not me or almost anyone I know. Most of us are the children of people who emigrated here LOOOOOOONG after the native lands were stolen and aren't related to the people who did it) Yes, we understand we gave you fire water and ruined your lives. We have also paid you back for it. Over and over and over again. And besides, if it wasn't 'us' it would've been someone else. Get over it. Grow up. 
You don't......  It's all probability and chance. I try to keep a record of how many times I've been right, and how many times I've been wrong. Turns out I'm wrong 99% of the time. So now I just assume I'm wrong 100% of the time. 
I personally never have liked the guy, so this is fucking hilarious to me.
Suddenly, rising sea levels. Oh, sad face ...
[evil?](http://media.tumblr.com/tumblr_liwvb3yfZp1qdgu7s.jpg)
Every Spacehog album and Caress of Steel by Rush.
I had to freehand draw Africa and label as many countries as possible for a High School history class so I can place most of them pretty well as well(those countries are east to west then top to bottom for the most part). Once you get below the horn it starts getting easier as well. The west coast of Africa is the most difficult part especially by the gulf of Guinea and to the west. 
Thanks, I wrote that for the \/r/mylittledaww competition.  Thank you, you too!
Playing the devil's advocate here - but maybe by "haunted" they could mean they would be haunted by the thought/memory of losing a child each time they used the item.  I had a miscarriage before I conceived and had my daughter - there are still some things that trigger the memory of that lost child - that can be haunting at times.  Just my $0.02.
fischer may be the the craziest dude this side of david barton.   it's like no one pays that much attention to him so he's always saying crazier and crazier shit.  must want a job at fox, fill beck's shoes
I don't understand why my movie is getting such negative reviews. 
&gt;&gt;hacking  skiddie go away
Thank you!
what time? haven't been to lloyd's since my 8th birthday, haha.
Pretty sure whimmy_millionaire did it for the karma though.
Chumbawamba - Tubthumping
This is called Boy Scouts
It's a great business to get into if you want lots of dragon scales and dragon bones, though.
What do you guys think about the various cameos by Rush Limbaugh?
that's_the_joke.tiff
No one is 100% straight, [not anymore.](http://i.imgur.com/5PiWM.jpg)
sudo apt-get install xfce4
What I've seen so far is that many students DO in fact look up to this man, and still do despite this coming out.  We need to realize that this generation grew up watching internet porn and they really don't give a crap about shit like this.
Hi. I've never heard of you but I like how you skinned your Youtube channel. I think you did a good job and you should keep it up.
I live in a country called Guatemala, we've got an amazing weather perfect for growing a small pot of "pot" in my room. Haha.
That was a very informative reply.  I hope I run into you one day just so I can tell you in person how funny and awesome (I think - as you said "that's your opinion" to someone earlier) you are.
No one's debating that, he's a fucking beast on the ice and I wish he was on my team, but he's also got this face you just want to pummel with a tire iron and the attitude to match!
The lawyer only speaks  for the first 25-30minutes of the video. The cop that speaks after the Lawyer basically confirms everything the lawyer stated.   The TLDR is that if a Cop is talking to you or wants to talk to you that means you are suspected or at least on the police radar. You would be better served not speaking to the police because anything you say to the police can be used against you but never help you in court.  The example he used was that if you tell the cops, "Ya I didn't like the guy but I didn't kill him" You just told the Cops that you didn't like the guy and the prosecutor can then put the cop on the stand and get him to prove that "you didn't like the guy." There is your motive. If you had not talked to the police the prosecutor wouldn't be able to establish motive.   Its really interesting and worth the watch. 
19 as well, remember them all, and you just brought back so many memories :')
watching him play on USMNT he has pure raw talent. he makes some amazing plays but lacks consistency and needs to pick his head up sometimes.
The Katamari Damacy Theme Song... and I also want a clown to add irony
Probably should have backed up his world then. Considering how easy it is there is really no excuse. 
Are you really going to claim that it's a waste to eat horses because they are useful?  Today horses (in the US) are kept almost purely for recreational purposes, there are outliers such as the Amish of course.
Any of these? Was it a One Cup style container, or bigger?  http://orange.zero.jp/zbb38369.park/htmldata/aomono.html
I'm not sure why you're getting downvotes... You made a relevant post, with good information.  It's funny... The original comic is joking about a Mac user shoving Mac's down someone's throat... But then the majority of the comments here are doing the exact same thing with PC's.  It's a personal preference.  Let people use whatever they want to use.  Stop acting like you are better than someone because you have don't make the same choices in what computer you use.
Maggie looks like a younger version of a crazy aunt I have that I can't stand. I can't watch movies with Maggie in them because of it.
This is especially true for low level and low Elo games. Those are where the most flamers and crying QQers are.  Once you start to get into higher skill-level games people are willing to admit their mistakes and help each other out. There's always the usual pessimists with their surrender vote spam but it's not that bad.  Don't forget to report abusers, friend, the tribunal is always looking out for them!
Yeah, I had the same issue. That has to be a mistake... I don't want to do it by hand and I'll certainly miss someone...
noodles n company!1!11!!
[Here you go.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xv-0Sr-BV5A&amp;feature=player_embedded)
Liam Neeson is a great actor, he just isn't the right actor for this role
I'm a fan of both. Lounge is just a fantastic music genre.
Meh, it was Godzilla's will for thousands of people to die, so it's justified.
Xbox 360, Rock Band 3 (possibly the Pro Guitar and keyboard controllers as well), Dark Heresy books, Warhammer stuff.
Man, if I downvoted everything I didn't care about on Reddit, I'd have to quit my job. I think this is an important AMA because Redditors like you, who stereotypically claim to be non-judgmental, openly rank themselves in importance high above artists. It's nice to have an artist who is willing to articulate what he does and what his education was like to better inform the Reddit populace, because there's quite a bit of art ignorance about. 
Bestpost ever
Why downvotes?
If have problems with joint pain ask your self are you taking creatine? If so all you need to do is A: Stop taking Creatine or B: Drink more water. Creatine takes water from your body and shoves it into your muscles to help hydrate them and slightly enlarge / enhance performance. This will drain your joints if you arent drinking enough water.
[Idealist](http://www.idealist.org) pretty much has a lockdown on this situation.  However, don't forget to check out regular job sites, as well.
Now you should convince her to get all 3 major credit agencies to freeze her credit verification.  That would stop any accounts from being opened in the near future.
The court is responsible for the court's decisions.
who's mark?
All white collar huh. Guess there wasn't a vacancy for a back scrubber.
It takes only one man to turn that internal strife into hatred for the external aggressor (and I am talking about Syria).
You don't individualise the tags on each product, you do it on the shelves.  I'm not saying the penny should be kept. Seriously I don't really think that has been the focus of any of the comments in this particular comment tree.  Seriously. On the shelves, not the individual items. I don't quite think you understand how scaling works either. Anyway not to worry, I think I'll leave you to it at this stage.
I've been looking at getting a wheel, and this is intriguing. Do you use yours on a table, though? Because from what I can see, there's no way to use it on, say, a stand, which would be most beneficial for me. I like the RennSport stand that Fanatec offers, but for my first wheel/pedal set, Fanatec seems way pricey. So I'm wondering if there's a way for me to set up the 458 in a similar fashion.
This is what I use at my small Southern Baptist university...  Ask the person if there was anything they could do to make their parents stop loving them.  When they answers "no" then say if God is our father/creator then wouldn't he feel the same way and love us no matter what.  If he doesn't love his own children/creations unconditionally then why would you want to worship him.  win/win
&gt;emailing someone else back and forth  stop emailing him. thats a large part of the problem
easier to draw
ARRGG BLOCKED! can you upload to something else please?
Back in my day, a quarter cost a nickel.
You do still have to clean the outside of the house plumbing where the connection is to shiny.
After the shittiest long days and late nights at work, shower-beer.  Hot shower + cold beer = tasty juxtaposition :)
what about the file named "assets_green_en_us_-1to0"
* Supreme Commander: Forged Alliance * Battlefield 1942  * Battlefield Vietnam * Battlefield 2 (AIX2 mod is great for co op) * Arma 2  * Mount and Blade Warband  Paradox rts like Hearts of iron, Victoria and Europa Universalis are great if everyone knows how to play them and 1 game can easily last a whole lan.
&gt; all three episodes  Do you remember their names?
Legally she does not own it.  On paper it says the title is with the Queen, but their are laws dictating who has total control of the land.  Canada Post is also titled in a simular fashion, but I think it is obvious that Canada Post is a c Canadian government company. Saying that the Queen owns the land, is akin to saying that the Queen writes all the laws in Canada.  Even when someone is tried for a crime in Canada, it is the Crown that is prosecuting.  But what it really comes down to, if for some reason Canada decided to cut all ties with the Queen, all of that land would just have it's title reverted to the various governments of Canada.  Land that is fully owned by the Queen, is titled with her actual name, followed by the initials of her royal titles.
yes please :3
You look ok. Very typical midwest easy on the eyes but nothing special type girl. 5/10
Free Doom.
I can safely say that will be on the cards regardless! 
We'll try to make it before then :P
Yes this is why it is referred to as an opiate
Enjoy.
Crown Prosecution Service? cool
epic
Gootecks does. (kekeke)
Thank you so much. My sister had mentioned that I should talk to a priest but I'm not very religious and I thought it would be mostly discouragement but now that I know there are some that talk positively about it I will look into talking to a priest and talk to my sister as well :) I think I have heard of that book before from some other people so I will get on that. The movie is not available online/streaming but it is available on DVD if you have that part of the plan. If my family was at a different stage with all of this I would show them this movie as well. I am going to have my partner watch it hopefully this weekend with me at least. 
On an island in British Columbia.
oh man i wish i would have known about this earlier! That's gonna be super fun!
That's why I am calling them off
http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Meme  Also, I read a book on the subject not too long ago called something like "Virus of the Mind". I forget who it was by, but that might be for the better as he continued to beat the same weak point to death through the entire book. I bought it for 99 cents when it was cheap for the kindle. 
Its a good start, you need more radios.  But please keep on kicking ass for our country.
Bards College.
I actually think girls look pretty cute in those. Never got the big deal.
[Could be worse](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VqB1uoDTdKM)
Every now and then it will just crash to desktop. Just like that. I'm walking around all happy then BAM. Desktop. Luckily I'm a saveohlic so I never lose too much progress :)
The source (EUTimes/Sorcha Faal) has a long reputation for posting unsubstantiated bullshit.  I wouldn't worry about it.
I'm not sure what you mean by master list. I think you mean an Approved Submitter list. Approved Submitters are exempt from the spam filter. Most users, however, are not Approved Submitters.   If you find yourself getting stuck in there consistently, you can message the moderators of that subreddit and ask that your posts be approved. You can also plead your case for being added to the Approved Submitter list but this, in my opinion is harder to do as it has the potential to result in abuse. Not always, but sometimes.   You aren't new around here though. It surprises me  that you're having this problem. 
he has 1+(10-1) apples of course
Who said it was the same person?
Sadly I haven't had a chance to try either one, but I've heard nothing but great things!
The courts.
good info - thanks.  Being tasty is the best part - i've never favored tuna or salmon.
Yes your right dude. They have failed in that matter. As for iPhone don't get me started being anti- apple...what more do they have up their sleeves? It's all product maintenance now for all phone manufacturers, through the product life cycle. That's why Andriod is the way forward ;) Imagine Apple fail in the phone sector due to not using standardising technologies.
FRIDAY
I'm in the Northeast, but I would be down for an East side meetup, depending on the time and date, and assuming I can find someone to babysit my spawn.  
I started a fic and put down 800+ words in about an hour and a half. I had a history assignment of about the same length that took me three times as long. 
This sounds lot like the relationship of Jenna and Paul from 30 Rock.
&gt;horses are probably healthier to eat than cows, since they arent corn-fed, etc.   That's just because they haven't been industrialized yet. Don't worry, the machine can work fast when needed.
Damn right son!
You should stream!
yay! MORE!
Items plz
That doesn't help as much as you'd think. If you do a hour of asskicking sore-the-next-day yoga, that burns maybe 200 calories. If you need to create a 500cal/day deficit, that's not as useful as watching what you eat.
This is pretty sad. I remember this was one of my first magazine subscriptions. GI and the PSM/Xbox/whatever magazines pretty much killed it since they were backed by bigger companies. 
you'd think carrying around more phials and vials than a chemistry lab would affect carry weight.
It does, but only users who keep up with the news and have at least some technical knowledge will ever be aware of this. Everybody else will just keep on happily installing those "antivirus apps" on their smartphones. If these *did* alert all users to malware that couldn't be easily removed, *all* of those users would be aware of the uselessness of those malware scanners. It's an easy decision for anti-malware makers.
I came in here looking for this post. I was not let down!
Never done the Vegas thing before and I do have some extended family who live there. Any specific places to hit?
I'm not a college dropout, but I am a high school drop out. I only completed up to the tenth grade (and even that barely).  I am not a chemical engineering major earning a 4.0 GPA in college, so I think I'm doing pretty well. 
Except TOR doesn't use Origin...
I bet [this](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Avenue_of_the_Giants) was their inspiration.
Are you F*%&amp;$*g Kidding me? Sorry guys, I could care less if they homebrew, OR if their beer is actually good! What is ridiculous is that a horrible so called teen band from years ago is actually going to try and market a beer. Sorry not diggin' it. 
I love reading dumb facebook posts. post that shit
Two words: braille
Actual raid: Deathwing and his minions (Twilight Hammer) is raiding Wyrmrest temple. You are to counter-raid Deathwing and stop him from doing so. 
We had some other positions open before the holidays, some of them entry level. I guess they filled fast, sorry I couldn't be more help.
Is there anything Ferrari does these days that doesn't slightly reek of douchebagery?
Yes, I'm aware of that. Note the quotation marks, I heard some people on OWS use that phrase. Edit: And it wasn't my case, nor was it any treasure trove of information. I just found this random funny picture. 
[Here you go.](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/muto1/hihi_birdie_and_i_am_the_cheese_photographic/)
It's a secret code to communicate with other members of the Phallocratic Society, but I've already said too much.  Best regards,   Cockdick W. McPenisson
Consider it done :P
congratulations, you made it :P
cant stop reading everything in "rap" now damnit
Stay away from Groupon....   Your best bet is to focus on strategic alliances, work out your customer profile and find non competing businesses that share your customers.  Profiling your clients is the single most important thing you can do!
Having lived in DC, I can tell you, I never did the dick thing but I always refer to it as "the phallus". Especially at night, "The phallus is angry" (because of it's two red lights at the top). 
Becoming is one word...
yet
your placement for DC is still 1st.
I agree with you sentiment, but  &gt;Vote with your wallet   isn't just talking about the cost of the phone itself. It's also the carrier that you select, plan you pick, services you use, etc...  However, most people don't care or don't understand, and the few of us that do probably have no collective effect at all.
Hah!  I once drew a helicopter filming 2 boats racing on the ocean, and got told by my teacher that I wasn't allowed to draw anything that "could be used for war" (eg. the chopper).  She was a dried up, old ass though; and my mom totally stuck it to her. Could draw pretty much anything I wanted after that :)
Make a hole in the floor and put down sand. cactus on top of sand with a trapdoor on top of that. tadaa
[Well he has this under his belt](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QKs8rCy3tQY)
Every fucking time. 
Itaewon is on the other side of the country of WCG this year :( which is in Busan, Itaewon freedom!!!
I am a CS major (surprise), I might go into computer security or maybe some Artificial Intelligence programming. I haven't decided though.
Is that an animal?
The only thing that bugs me are Dragons - they need to be rarer and significantly stronger. As it stands, with the dual enchanting perk they can only melee hit me (resistance to fire/frost), which is either easy to avoid as a ranged character/stagger mage, or easily tankable thanks to being a warrior. At worst, my dual-wield character might have to run like a bitch and heal out of range, but I never have to worry about their breath attacks.
Understandably we have staff on reddit. Upon you bringing it up, this vulnerability has been reported. Thank you for bringing this to our attention. 
Any idea where to buy this?
It's a mask that you get from Krosis, a dragonpriest, at Shearpoint.  They should be calling it the "Krosis mask."
[](/c24 "♫I love ponies, I love every kind of pony♫")  [](/c21 "♫I just want to hug them all but I can't♫")  [](/c05 "♫Can't hug every pony, can't hug every pony♫")
&gt;Hey, they had great scientists. scientist just like to do science, they don't care on which side they are as long as they get money for it.  As a historian, my sense of civility is keeping me from strangling you.
Just so we are ABSOLUTELY clear: you feel that there is nothing about the movement that contributes to its lack of success?
A good ssd will help tremendously with the loading time of such image.   Current hard drive have sequential read getting up to about 120mb/s but more often are lower than that, especially if your file is fragmented.  Some ssd on the other end can have sequential read of up to 570mb/s if you have sata 3 on your motherboard.  This should make your image load much faster but ssd cost a lot.
Suddenly:[Backpacks](http://imgur.com/gallery/zIQIt)
I'm sure it's great, but I'm not downloading an exe file.
When he was just a little baby yes but he's growing into them :)
Well, he is doing all of these videos for free. What more could you ask for? Sure, he can get "very defensive". However, I understand his position. He doesn't want Youtube users to walk all over him and take his stuff for granted.  I agree he is not the greatest teacher(who truly is?). However, he does offer higher quality lessons than most of the other free teachers on the internet. They have definitely helped me. Regardless of his attitude his lessons still work.  Basically, his stance is that if you don't like it, then enroll in some classes.
To be clear, Durian is wack.  Shit smells like everything that is wrong with the world.  Edit: This is a common thread.  People hate Durian.  Why the hell do people still eat it?
haha I like this, I might just have to try this (or my interpretation of what you mean)
No raw with mayo on it.  Awkward food to be thrown at an awkward man.
[Treevenge](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Vaiv7kAXBzM) is a 16 minute youtube movie about lumberjacks who take down  Christmas trees but get hunted down by trees themselves. 
Yeah, I figured this was a good enough screenshot, brownie points for you though, didn't think anybody would notice
Fair enough. Not the faster reload though :)
Yeah, my allergies are acting up :'c
Fat Matt's or Daddy D'z
Ive got a shaymin. Message me if  you want to trade. 
Everytime I see your username I think of [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=135yH1rZHGI).
It is a serious accusation, corruption is always a serious accusation, whether there is legal repercussions or not! Game reviewers don't get paid enough at all, they are all quite poor to be honest, I suppose I would be suspicious of any rich ones...  The problem is that they start delving into corruption, the industry loses credibility and they all lose their jobs. Its not worth the risk
Thanks.  A friend of mine did a lot of stuff on the War of 1812.  I personally wrote and produced a 6 hour miniseries on "The American Revolution" for A&amp;E in 1994.  A career highlight for me.
http://maddowblog.msnbc.msn.com/_news/2011/11/30/9123613-now-running-on-the-occupation-party-ticket  You laughed, but apparently I'm not the only one who thought this.
ONE OF MANY, BITCHES!!   Edit: Comma. A very important comma. 
No it ain't, 'nly thang you damn scale-skins are gud fer is fer making me sum nice scaley boots.
I don't totally understand the down votes...  From my frame of reference (Eastern Oregon) this is quite the true statement.  It stinks... :'(
anathema with an added mancer to it.
That's what the elder tiger cub did at Harvard. She's in the same grade as my sister (yea she's at Harvard. This parenting style works.) and according to her she dresses like a slob wearing Yale sweatshirts (the horror!), takes the easiest classes, and spends most of her time shopping. I have too much drive, am too competitive, and am too scared of bad grades for that to happen to me though. Working hard brings good results.
Jesus is totally a bottom. Read the Bible. 
I see  It sounds like you want to fix it then. The only thing software I can think of that would cause this is the touchpad software disabling left click if your bumping another key, or something like that. When you can't left click are you able to right click and bring up menus and such? I once saw a touch pad button get stuck in the on position, very weird.  Anyway, for hardware if you are somewhat mechanically inclined you could try taking off the keyboard and inspecting the touchpad, spray some compressed air and see if anything dislodges. This can be a real pain though.
I SAID I'M SORRY MAMA. I DIDN'T MEAN TO HURT YOU. I DIDN'T MEAN TO MAKE YOU CRY, BUT TONIGHT, I'M CLEANING OUT MY CLOSET.
The feline version of angry wolf. Lol
up-vote for that edit.
I played around with the setscale to 10 on myself minutes ago, and a little note, just because you are tall, fast and can jump high, dosen't mean fall damage dosen't mess you up!  Ouch.
Except that the southern USA had 500+ tornadoes in one month. That is supposed to be a yearly average. Everything is ok.
&gt;Is the telling of or the laughing at jokes about stealing, cheating on your SO, drunken behavior, over-eating, racist behavior, etc. really seen as a "covert nod of approval" by thieves, cheaters, alcoholics, over-eaters and racists?  Actually, yeah. I'd say jokes about all of those things legitimize them, depending on the joke.  See, jokes are things where we don't sit down and discuss afterwards why they were funny. You tell the joke, I laugh, you get some reassurance that I approve. But often people are telling jokes to deflect an insecurity or to seek approval in a safe way. For example, I might joke to my coworker that when I go out of town, I'm totally going out and fucking some sluts. He knows I have a wife, and laughs. Maybe he thinks it's dark humor. But I get a little reassurance that hey, maybe this guy agrees that it's okay to go out and fuck sluts. Everyone does it.  It could go the other way - I think it's dark humor, but he cheats on his wife. My values of never cheating aren't clear. Do I like to fuck sluts, or am I monogamous?  That's the point the letter is making. A lot of people think it's totally fine to steal, cheat, get drunk constantly, over-eat, and be racist. Other people don't approve of any of those things. But we don't often sit down and chat about each other's norms. We communicate culture through jokes. Given that fact, you should be careful about what you're communicating when you make a joke or laugh at one.
Let me guess, you are 1/16th Cherokee. 
I have to admit I'm not sure how it determines the price of transmogging but I just used this trick on an heirloom chest, shoulders, and weapon and it cost me 3g total. 
FIOS all the way!  Its unbelievably fast.  Also, I've had exactly one outage in the last 2.5 years.
Also, would anyone happen to know a good weekly schedule?  After two days running 5 miles, my legs are pretty shot. So maybe I need to space it out? Not sure. Still getting into the physical training thing.  Thank you all for your help so far, upvotes for you all! :)
While I have heard that a bunch, never had that happen. including an 11% that fermented 6 months.  But, you can never go wrong with champagne yeast added for bottling.
Nevinyrral the original ;-)
*Canada five!*
[My attempt](http://i.imgur.com/SIqOr.png)  Done by hand in Inkscape. [Here's the vector file \(svg\)](http://db.tt/k4r5jOGU)
Have a thumbs up. づ｡◕‿‿◕｡)づ
If your manager doesn't have the decency to tell her to GTFO, change jobs. 
&gt;Also worth noting: how people use a word has no bearing on the correct definition.  How did come to derive those definitions in the first place, if not from the way people use them?  And what use is a definition if it can't account for a common usage of a term?
"Players collide, and then collide again, banging shoulders like they're drunk in a bar and looking for a fight, while the ball languishes untouched between them"  Probably THE most annoying thing that happens atleast 10 times imo every single game..... How do they get away with bringing a game out that is broken so much in the collision system?
Quick trader, awesome! :D
yeah I know, sorry about that I tried to fix it but it just wouldn't happen and it was too late!
I'm not sure why you had to put an IRL...Dwarf Fortress IS IRL...right...?
[](/x00)
Had this happen to me with my dads Taurus 9mm. That thing always does something weird with the last shell in the mag.
but what did he do for the last 57 minutes?
Starting to think you're the person who posted the photo on FB.
Jordy is too much of a risk imo. He fucked me last week after three stellar weeks that I didn't have the confidence to start him. I think I'm gonna go with Victory Cruz and see what happens
So your desire to be a man is greater than your attraction to females?
That would be a dream come true.
[Original.](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/muto1/hihi_birdie_and_i_am_the_cheese_photographic/)
There aren't any. I'm not sure you could possibly show something like that using statistics, so I don't know what he's claiming.  Obviously, if you look at statistics, the teams that took the players that were best *in hindsight* are going to have received better production from those players.  Besides, I'm not sure how anyone can possibly evaluate players relative to other positions *except* by looking at your team's need. Let's assume that there existed a statistic that *could* measure that.  It would have to show a) that the player was considered objectively better than a need player at that draft slot AT THE TIME OF THE DRAFT (if anyone could actually objectively determine this, the draft would move a hell of a lot faster), and b) that the player's added value is objectively higher than a player on a different team, at a different position, in a different system.  If there's actually a statistic that shows this, I'd love to know of it, because I could clean out some sports books in Vegas.  Edit:  Oh, and in answer to the original question:  I really like Claiborne. I think he potentially has that "Have fun throwing to the other half of the field, because this territory belongs to me" aspect that Deion, Champ Bailey, Raiders Asomugha and Revis had/have.
Saw dozens of search units and helicopters today outside of my work, Mitsubish Power Systems, near Florida Mall. Insane!
Whole fight bloodlust/time warp. Yes please.
Stop what? 2007?   It's a date, man! An entire year! It cant just *stop*, it's already happened! You're crazy!
OP took insanity puppy to the vet to be neutered. OP came home without balls.
i got it. i just created a function and used document.images[].src to switch it with s.value. thanks for the help
Luther (BBC)   Homeland (Showtime)
I worry that I'm a nice guy some times but I can't really tell if I am or not. I don't stand at her feet doing whatever she wants and I don't cling to her like saran wrap, but I can't shake the feeling that maybe I am a nice guy and just don't know it...
You got that backwards.
Agree with this article a lot.  One thing I have found really helpful is breaking my app into separate apps/services.  It is a lot easier to upgrade those gems when the application itself is doing only a few simple things (and thus has only a couple of gem dependencies).   Also, it allows you to slowly upgrade your services.  If there is one gem that is preventing you from upgrading then that service is locked, but your other services are free to upgrade.  
Okay. That sounds fair. My dad actually has an e-bay account, I guess I will ask him about it.  Is it the same way through Amazon?
Personally, there's not always a lot going on in this subreddit, so I think it's pretty easy to find text posts. Just change your settings to 100 posts per page and you'll find the text based posts really quickly. 
Sounds like a language assignment I guess? Where he has to ask someone something and record their answers in the language? Or maybe he's doing a survey of allergies? 
&gt; So, we are down to the final four right now. In one tier, it's Huntsman and Romney; in the other it's Paul and Gingrich.  I have a hard time believing that primary voters that have bounced from Gingrich to Bachmann, to Perry, to Cain, back to Gingrich, would support Paul.   Paul and Huntsman share the same campaign issue: People don't understand their accomplishments..  What do people know about Paul? They know about what he would love to change. They know he votes "no" on a lot of things.   But what are his accomplishments? He's spent no time telling people what bills he's sponsored, what he's gotten done.   It's easy to fight against earmarks on principle, then vote for them anyway, when you're one guy in Congress. It's how the game's played. But as President, you have to get stuff done, and show you're not fighting for the perfect at the expense of the good.
NO.
If I wanted to get a job as a web developer or software developer what would I *need* to know and what would the extras and bonuses be?
Amazing. 
next picture better be NSFW
Tough titties brah.  
I think so!
The space is about 500 square feet, divided between two rooms.  Our primary mission is building community resilience.  We're all about free events that bring people together and inspire friendships: game night, storytelling, weekly free skillshare workshops (bicycle building, cooking, permaculture), and potlucks.
this would be a great owling tree.
Ah so you meant specifically story-based single player games. Gotcha.
Someone disagrees with you about politics? LOL CHOKE HIM.
Just shows how Man U get the "easiest" team out of the remaining teams. If they went through they would have got Cardiff....   Man City though?? Time for Suarez to man up and start his goal machine mentality 
 &gt;and people got jobs, and now there is a growing middle class and China is a rising economic power, and then  I'm not sure where you hear that China has a middle class. It rates 56 in the [World wealth Index](http://www.prosperity.com/rankings.aspx)  2003 in just one province of the rustbelt, with three million people participating. Some 30 to 40 million workers who were dropped from work units   Ching Kwan Lee study into Chinese labor   “Chinese are plagued by a profound sense of insecurity,” arousing “rage and desperation” around the country. And she expects that there’s worse to come, as a looming crisis of landlessness in the countryside undermines the base for survival of the sunbelt workers."   &gt; they wrote the right to own private property into the constitution in 2004, and so   They also have souring rhetoric about democracy and freedom in their constitution.  You simply can't own property in China. And you can't own it if you are not a citizen. &gt;It is just as illegal to put melamine in milk in China as it is in America or Europe. Congratulations, you have identified an issue where government failed at its assigned task of regulation   Next time you are in a third world country have a burger at a food stand  for me. I Kind of like Ron Pauls talk about getting rid of certain regulations and replacing them with suicide laws.   Next time [this](http://www.monsourlawfirm.com/component/content/article/11-pfizer-pay-largest-fine-in-us-history.html) happens The company gets **murdered** just like a real person and it's assets are divided up and sold.   No more sociopaths company, A safer market, smaller companies own their patents and intellectual property. Un accountable stock holders get fucked for not paying attention. Everybody wins.  
lolumad
The biggest pointer I can give you is "be dispassionate".
Agreed on Catwoman.  I was horribly disappointed.  I also like how Batgirl is handling the transition back to walking.  I was a bigger fan of Oracle than Batgirl so I was sad about the change for many reasons.  But I feel like the way it's being handled is so perfect that I can't really complain.  Batgirl is quickly becoming my favorite of the DCNU.  
I had my wedding band resized at around 3 months. Why not the engagement ring as well, you ask? Well, because I didn't put it on and then have it get stuck and have to be cut off by (a hunky, charming, crew of five) firemen. We had it resized as it was repaired, and I wore it by itself until the engagement ring fit again at about 6-9 months. Luckily since that one is worn on the outside, it holds the now-loose wedding band on.   Be patient, and for the love of all that is good, do not put them on if you think you might have a hard time getting them off.
Not to mention that the Aldmeri word for the Eight Divines, is 'Aedra', which means 'Our Ancestors'. They believe they are actually descendent's of the Eight.   (On a related note 'Daedra' means 'Not our Ancestors'. The names and the fact that the Eight created Mundus are the only really differences between the two groups.)
Donated. Did what I could. Best of luck to ya, young fella. 
[](/b03) Fuck it, I'm not clicking on it. Ignorance is bliss.
Totally agree.  I don't even know how ppl play FPS games with the controller TBH.  KB/Mouse all the way.  That said, games like Batman or Street Fighter 4; the controller is pretty handy.
OWS is not the first shot in the 'information war.' It's one of may shots, which include but are not limited to the efforts of WikiLeaks and Anon.
  Everybody says there is this RACE problem. Everybody says this RACE problem will be solved when the third world pours into EVERY white country and ONLY into white countries.  The Netherlands and Belgium are just as crowded as Japan or Taiwan, but nobody says Japan or Taiwan will solve this RACE problem by bringing in millions of third worlders and quote assimilating unquote with them.  Everybody says the final solution to this RACE problem is for EVERY white country and ONLY white countries to “assimilate,” i.e., intermarry, with all those non-whites.  What if I said there was this RACE problem and this RACE problem would be solved only if hundreds of millions of non-blacks were brought into EVERY black country and ONLY into black countries?  How long would it take anyone to realize I’m not talking about a RACE problem. I am talking about the final solution to the BLACK problem?  And how long would it take any sane black man to notice this and what kind of psycho black man wouldn’t object to this?  But if I tell that obvious truth about the ongoing program of genocide against my race, the white race, Liberals and respectable conservatives agree that I am a naziwhowantstokillsixmillionjews.  They say they are anti-racist. What they are is anti-white.  Anti-racist is a code word for anti-white.
uhh fellas... arent you just glad that there are some BEAUTIFUL titties out here for us to look at? dont discourage... just appreciate  and to the writer, try freshbacon cuz she turns me on like none other.
why isnt mera in this picture
Becau'se that would be 'silly.
All this friend zoned business is going to scare the girl off. Stop pressuring them, people. Let them do their thing.
She killed my horse. Ice wolves were attacking me and the horse, I turn around and the horse is dead. When I go to loot it, is has like 20 arrows in it. I don't use arrows.
Ohhh, I like this game. It's fun played it on subday
The issue is about people assembling to beseech their government, who is supposed to represent them, to deal with this issue.  The response is, "Fuck you. We have the guns and the moustaches. Pack your belongings and get on this train."
That's funny my 9 year old niece loves these movies.  You'd think Hollywood made it just for 9 year old girls just like her!
I've seen interesting things done with ink and soap bubbles.
Too realistic.
Mt Petzl(head lamp) and my Kershaw(pocket knife) I live in a town where cougars and power outages are frequent...I need to know which way to frantically stab my knife when it's dark outside. 
Excellent article a few years back in RS about him, his diet and his cancer. Really unique and interesting guy!  
i would like a job...evenings...maybe 7 or 8pm till 2 am or so =)
Did he really reject A ton of money from Microsoft for It?
I can tell by the pixels...
[This](http://thatguywiththeglasses.com/bt/the-sage/fanfic-theatre/15170-ep012a) is my favorite fanfic reading of all time, in a multi-part series.
wait.. why is netflix stupid?
It's the new Friends: Group of late 20-somethings somehow living in large New York apartments they couldn't possibly afford.  The Friends opening credits have them partying in a fountain and that has nothing to do with the show either, but it works.
Well yea $10 for each would be a bit much but my point was simply that even at that rate for many of us the content we want would still be cheaper than cable.
&gt;Once an insurance company has money to loose from damages cause by polution happening and money to gain from it not happening, there is an obvious incentive to prevent it.  Again, you're not being specific.  YOu have not answered the question and are simply answering in vague platitudes because you know you can't answer the question.  If I take out pollution insurance, what incentives would the insurance company give my neighbors so they don't pollute?   &gt;Even if a business is only suspected of dumping and not proven, an insurance company could refuse to insure them. Without insurance they could lose their financing, because they would be a bigger risk.  This is false.  I can easily get life insurance without car insurance, and car insurance without homeowners insurance.  You're speaking in vague platitudes again because you know you have no specific examples to back it up.  Not even hypothetical examples.   &gt;This is what worries me. It has no systemic incentive to succeed. Only the good hearts of the people in it.  This is why it will work: it's not motivated to make money.  If it were motivated to make money, it would have no incentive to solve global warming; it would simply lie about it, fund science to lie about it, and create fear to keep people funding it.  Once pollution is gone, it can't make money anymore, and goes out of business.  Without pollution, it has no product.   &gt;Just stating that does not create incentives. Economists look for incentives, even if they are not monetary.  This is why countries with national healthcare have better healthcare than countries with private healthcare.  The incentive is that it betters society as a whole and saves the environment.  That's the incentive.  The incentive isn't money. &gt;The incentives of a global authority on pollution would be to perpetuate its own existence.  The organization is not primarily interested in staying in existence.  It's primary function is to reduce pollution. I have a few questions, and I appreciate your speedy responses.  This is a good discussion, despite my harshness.  1) What incentive does the pollution company have to reduce pollution?  Once pollution is gone, their business is gone; they won't be making any profits.  2) Did the national building code that the insurance companies create actually reduce the spread of fires at all?  I can see enforceable government building codes working (Hati vs. Japan earthquakes), but would like evidence that these private ones would work.
Seriously?   This was just asked the other day. How about something new?
Holy crap, he talks so fast, O____O
Soreness is a poor indicator of how hard your muscles work. When squatting, your abdominal muscles are working isometrically. Isometric work will never make you nearly as sore as concentric or (especially) eccentric work. This doesn't mean your abdominal muscles don't get a tough workout.
It didn't unfortunately, unless I missed it but I don't think I did. I ordered one from Amazon but my monitor will still not connect. I'm going to try a different DVI to VGA adapter tomorrow and see if it is a faulty adapter.
[This is the video.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=h3fJSeeyED4) What still confuses me about that video is he goes at it with a hacksaw when its vertical, so you have the most metal to go through. Surely you could cut it horizontally where it's thin and get through quickly? 
[How did I do?](http://i.imgur.com/9SUHl.jpg)
Ways to get court marshalled #316:  Attempt to infiltrate Area 51.
Every time I drove on 110, the lights were always against me. WTF 110?! 
I'm with you man. I can't really give you a definitive answer as to why it is so prevalent within the church aside from speculation.
thank you for your permission, now bend over 
Last month, after the Fresno State game, Mark Johnson was on location at the stadium and Kim Fields asked Mark about Fresno's mascot, Victor E. Bulldog. Mark casually stated that the bulldog they chose for their mascot had died last year. Kim had no idea how to respond and there was a good 10 seconds of awkward silence. That's when I noticed his awkwardness the most.
Say you have a complex number z = x + iy  ln (z) = ln(x+iy).  Another representation of z would be in polar form, i.e. z = re^i(theta) .  If we substitute this definition of z into our logarithm, we get something pretty interesting:  ln(z) = ln(re^i(theta) ) = ln(r) + ln(e^i(theta) ) = ln(r) + i(theta), using standard logarithm properties.  Now, we must be careful in how we express the angle when we convert to polar form because e^i(theta) = e^i(theta)+2(pi)k , for any integer k.  As a result, we need to define a branch cut when dealing with logarithms.  Look at the Wikipedia article:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Complex_logarithm   Edit:  for some of the other questions, this might help:  e^ix = cosx + isinx  e^-ix = cos(-x) + isin(-x) = cos(x) - isin(x) [Since cos is an even function and sin is odd].   Now, can you solve for cos(x) and sin(x) using those two equations above?  Using that definition, try finding what sin(3 pi i) is.
[](/ppforever "wikipedia changed the layout for the appeal banner, so i don't think we'll be getting a fix for this any time soon. fuck") http://www.reddit.com/r/mylittleandysonic1/comments/mv9xc/its_time_for_one_of_these_threads/c345a8p
In the end the point is simple, if LSU and Alabama have a re-match, you will never truly know who is the better team, LSU or Oklahoma State (if they beat Oklahoma and won their bowl game).  Alabama might just be the second best team in the country, but who's to say that Oklahoma State wouldn't dominate LSU?  My guess is that it wouldn't happen, but it's a guess in the end.  If Michigan got their re-match against Ohio State in 2006, Florida would have never gotten their chance to pummel Ohio State.  If Alabama didn't play LSU and only had one lose to say Arkansas (of course they'd be devoid of their only great win) then they'd have a case.  The problem is though, they lost to LSU at home.  That loss in my opinion  holds more value than an Oklahoma State loss on the road in double OT, even if it was to Iowa State.  Alabama had the advantage  and opportunity and blew it.
I think this is only true if you define capital to include things like personal/family reputation, social capital, etc. I don't think, though, that you can argue that the accumulation of all this stuff has always been the primary incentive people act on.  In my understanding, you can effectively define capitalism (the ideology) as a system that not only makes capital accumulation and profit into primary incentives, but also makes money/currency itself into a basic industry through complex financial structures far removed from any kind of actual production or market dynamic.
http://i.imgur.com/zWa5B.jpg
It's cute how hard you're working at this.
Tell me sir, after a long and hard day of doing whatever the fuck it is that you do, can you immediately go and interact with females, or do you have to commute an hour and a half home, shower and change in order to not appear to be a putrid hobo to all the women of the world?
[Alot of mail?](http://imgur.com/mJIyx) That's a pretty nice thing to get from a gf.
You know redditors are going to keep demanding updates and are going to be devastated if you two decide to just be friends.
for background stuff hit up '[Central Casting](http://www.centralcasting.com/)'
Insecurity must be really hard for you.  One day, you will make your dad proud.  Maybe.
My dad is a head mechanic for 2 main corrugated box companies. One of them is in Baltimore, MD and the other is in Red Lion, PA, called Specialty Industries/Krafcor. I'm 21 and I'm going to enter an apprenticeship soon in hopes to become a 'traveling mechanic.' Any advice?
What is an "Manitoba"? Heheh just kidding man.
Ha I went looking through his comments to see was it the same person who left that comment. Reddit is a small world.
i should really get on board for no-weigh december. i don't think i could do it though.
AFAIK, when I was first notified that I had leveled up, and selected level up in menu, I was able to level the first 7 levels only doing around 5 quests (no main quests).  I literally didn't get a notice that I had leveled up and that I could select perks.  Is this kinda what you mean?  
The principal might be a religious freak and think you're possessed by some stick men demon. Then you won't be able to eat foods that are shaped like stick men and you know what kind of food are shaped like stick men?! THE BEST KINDS!
do you really believe that, or do you misunderstand the word "discussion"? 
Which prompts one to pull up your user id and inspect your one note submissions and answers. Blame the Banksters, blame Breitbart, blame the Koch brothers... or some other whine.
Leeds got to the playoffs with a 15 point reduction at the start of the season. if they keep their players and dont sell the best for pea nuts(remember John Aloisi going for 600k or some thing that one time 6 weeks after pompy was offered millions for him)they have to beat the worst three teams by 10 points. easy done
Seriously, though.  Akai's build quality is significantly better, in my opinion.
thanks for the reply, im off to look into that calculator. buts it's good to know that it is achievable.
http://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16832116986  No, we each buy our own license.
[yep.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XVCtkzIXYzQ)
"those who fixate on this latest round of labor force entrants have no idea how deep our labor market problems really are"  I think they're fixated on the fact that it's 40,000 people used to working hard, organizing, and getting stuff done being added to the unemployed crowd that they're worried about.
Yes, but a rake head? How strong would the bristles need to be, and how hard would it be to throw it up and have it lock? Also, how could a little girl tie a strong enough know around a rake head with a HOSE? I'm calling BS.
Sorry dude. :( This goes both ways. I've been on that side of this kind of thing before and it sucks. Just keep contributing and everyone wins!
Physics bringing the kids together.  *tear*...  NO SIR, THAT WAS AN EYELASH!
Rio rancho. Close enough.
Progress!  
Including all the vandalism and joke edits that were on Wikipedia when its copy was captured?
are you referring to the tiny, tiny sink?....it's not for midgets...just so you know.
You can find scantily clad girls anywhere on the internet these days; it's your smile that really makes it for me. 
Talent.
silicone baking spatulas. surprisingly satisfying as an itch-scratcher. also great for pointing at things
Have you seen Pixar movies?
I have used a Android device (two different ones) as my main mobile music player for over 2 years. I can recommend Meridian and Jukefox for playing music. Especially since you can listen to whole genres in both of them.  Music syncing is just drag and drop for me, or when I feel lazy I might open Amarok or Banshee.
It is certainly a variety of opinions. I like it. Need more AMA awesomeness. 
A lot of the stuff they do is legal within their own legal system but illegal elsewhere, and the rest of the world is a little bit horrified that you guys let it go on. (Assuming American redditor)
Why do you think her and Jim Carey broke up?
Their income last year was $54M.  That's about 200 homes, assuming they follow the 2.5 people/home, that covers 500 people in 1 year.  Provided their income was similar for the last 5 years, they would ALL be housed well by now.
I may be the only who watches it for Hannah Simone
**I COULD CARE LESS**
The mall is the best part about living in DC, free museums!
I haven't done it myself yet, but read [Arngeir, in High Hrothgar, gets pissed at you...for obvious reasons, and you won't be able to return to him for Words of Power location (whispers) anymore... So, I've decided once I know them all, I'll return to do the dirty deed, and start the Blades.] (/spoiler)
Why does everyone forget Arena and Daggerfall?
I live in Roswell for now. 
Tickets to Download Festival in UK
I would enrol at a Uni to do Macgyvering
wallpapered.
If sometime bad goes wrong...does that mean it turned out good? 
Good news!  &gt; There is no charge for a Social Security number and card. If someone contacts you and wants to charge you for getting a number or card, or for any Social Security service, please remember that Social Security services are free.   And you can probably get a state ID for $5 or $10 if you provide two forms filled out by people who you know reasonably well (teachers, your boyfriend, etc.) who can verify that you live at whatever address you live.  (I did this recently.)  If you find out how much an ID costs in your state (you are in the US right?), post about the cost here, and ask for the money or even a check made out to the DMV/RMV or whatever.  I bet you'll have folks happy to help you out with that.
Which "everyone" finds Paris Hilton attractive???
Definitely, she has quite a sexy voluptuous bod.  :D
I love how there is a military chopper flying around. Apprently lots of people died at this concert. 
It was more emotional when someone did it with Skyrim. This just made me chuckle.
Fail not getting spaghetti for the Lady and the Tramp moment.
I know it's kind of weird to buy a beard grower a razor, but this one is designed to take care of the little stray satellite hairs that grow off the beard and other facial hair, like below the eye sockets, end of the nose, just under the nose, and between the eyes. It's great for keeping everything looking kept up and does a great job. [The Merkur Moustache Razor](http://www.classicshaving.com/catalog/item/522941/195987.htm). As an added bonus if he actually tried to shave heavy growth areas with it , it would tear his face up and he'd never shave again. 
I love how the lady stops all the fun IMMEDIATELY after the fall. Doesn't even check to see if the kid is hurt just BAM! no more jumps go home.
Would anyone else like to go in on a marriage pool? I am only half kidding.
See the rest of the set [here](http://www.flickr.com/photos/26022506@N08/sets/72157627063775158/).
No problem. Happy gaming :)
They haven't been doing very well for a while. Their stock was in a downward trend since October 2006. They had an upward trend since 1986, then in 2006 they transitioned to a downward slope. Their stock plummeted in 2008, then rebounded shortly after (due to the bailout?) to continue its downward trend. 
are you sure you didn't hit the Tron button
Yep. It's mainly practicing my craft. Developing a style and voice with good flow. 
nope, government will be made up of political parties that all made heavy losses during the elections except I think one on the french minority side.  Having a gay pm will be hilarious though.
ah, I think I was unclear by what I meant by the dress code. What I meant to ask was whether it was appropriate to wear a suit because I would have to wear one to school afterwards (a suit is the uniform that my school uses) and was wondering whether it would be an issue to break the 'informal' dress code. Thanks for the reply
I think there would be a copyright issue, but that is pretty funny.
My dad was Bucky when he went to school here.Many family members attended and I have been raised as a Badger fan my whole life.  I tried to get into school here but got waitlisted.  Went to undergrad a couple hours away instead.  Graduated and got a job in Madison about a mile from the stadium.  Going to school for my masters online right now through the University of Florida but being so far away, I'm not really a fan.  
&gt;Maybe you were referring to the fiery rancor-like thing in EV?  That's what I thought phaandal was referring to  I'll take your word for it then that the palace is a one off, I consider myself pretty on top of things and I still haven't seen any solid info about that particular operation.
Now why can't they use this to get the word out to these cretins that they're spouting shit in the name of a religion that doesn't support it? Demand every priest give a sermon on how evolution is part of God's plan or something.
What is this referring to? Goddamn it. 
As a female, this makes me extremely excited to one day acquire an office job.
Although this appears to be done with some sort of varnish, you could probably try an acrylic paint or ink as well. In terms of the water tank make sure you clean it well first and replace the water if it starts to turn cloudy. Flash lighting would probably be best to isolate the movement and I'm guessing some post-processing was done to fine tune the colours. I'd experiment with different liquids, colours and how much/how fast you drop it into the water. 
More hyperbole! Ho ho! Will he ever stop?!?
The biggest reason this seems even slightly plausible to me is that there's some relatively obscure names that I wouldn't expect the average faker to know... Shackleton? Seriously? I hope it's true...
Fuck all of you.
The key is to have a manager cool enough to back you up. Thats the hard part. 
I read some where that Sushi-X was just a bunch of editors at EGM and it rotated around every now and then.
Opening mailboxes somehow makes me want to buy the fucking pandora pack and play this god fuckshit game that I love but still hate.
DnD 3.5 spellbook. Saved me hours of flipping through the PHB looking for details on the spells i'm using. 
¯\\\_(ツ)_/¯
ok i think im going to change it to a 60 min boil and lower the barley amout as well as raise the chocolate. I was just modifying a recipe for an american stout from a book I have and it calls for a 90 min boil but I don't see a reason to boil that long either. And you're very right, I'm going for a desert beer so those are some good tips. thanks!
HAHA. Would anyone believe me if I said I was actually 13?
Well, that really was a bad day !
Abusive and insulting.
It's all up to the mods. Any mod can give mod-powers to anyone else, if needed. Usually in the bigger subreddits, this is done when the community feels the need for more mods, or the mods are overwhelmed. Pics has 19, funny has 10, it's all up to the mods as to how many mods there are. The guy at the top of the pics mod list could de-mod everyone else and run it solo, if he wanted to. This actually happened, recently, with the IAmA subreddit. The head mod decided it was time to end it, posted on the subreddit as such, massive outcry, he relinquished his mod powers to people who wanted to continue it. I'll dig up the thread about it.  EDIT: [Here it is](http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/ju5cf/goodbye_iama_it_was_fun_while_it_lasted/), the powers that mods have. He was the only mod when this went down, and since then, the subreddit has been put in new hands.
Driving is a big one for me.   I often turn the radio off and just enjoy the near silence. 
Platinum is amazing. My favorite pokemon game, and plat. pokedex is better than the D/P one. (Moar pokemans.)
I fly Amarr ships. ┐('～`；)┌ 
Yaks? They were empty when I used them after the bot nuke.
Yep. It's actually the worst place you can get it, can cause blindness if untreated. It's best not to rub your eyes with your hands at all really...
Yeah, but that won't kill a Twinker.
You're growing up! But your still at an age where your choices aren't totally your own. Have you shown this to your parents? There are many brilliant (intellectually) cooks, by the way. Hopefully in time you'll find a way to pursue your dream. Best of luck.
Like Fox News
What if I fashioned a mullet-like wig using old squirrel parts and a rubber band?
Enemies of the *hair* beware
Depends on what General Education Requirements it fulfills
Nice I'm kinda near there. Know any epic spots? If you know Ashland, the T station driveway is at least a mile or so long, all hills, and fully lit at night. Pretty great
I hope you never in any way feel like anything is your fault. Because it isnt. Hope everything works out with your father, but please never blame yourself for anyway he feels or what he does.
They were still friends for about eight years after they divorced, but they ended up falling out due to child support issues and my dad fleeing the country.  My mom didn't marry again afterwards, my dad ended up getting married twice afterwards.  They probably had some feelings for each other in high school, but they both were already in relationships with other people during high school.  I used to think it would have been really cool if they were to get back together, because I wanted to have that perfect family unit. But now as an adult, I would only want them to get back together if they were truly in love, which I don't ever see happening.
I study Sociology and I don't do drugs anymore!
I'm not yelling, I just intended my entire post to be directed only to what the OP was looking for. Sorry if that came off as unclear.
If you're familiar with photoshop, then in After Effects you can use Effects-Color Correction-Curves or Levels for your color correction.  For the blur, add an adjustment layer (Layer-New-Adjustment Layer). Apply the blur to that, then draw a mask on the adjustment layer to isolate the blur to the area you want.
Seriously.
What Pizzadoos says about armor is true.  Whether or not Last Whisper is more cost efficient then another item at the time though is a different matter and I'm thinking I want to do the math on that one if I have time tomorrow.  Targets without any armor bonuses have around 75 armor at level 18 which is no small amount.   You would be cutting away about 20 to 30 Armor depending on your runeset which is no small amount.  
Those are separate group of people. I'm talking about people who see facts and can recognize phony from not but when confronted to something that affect them personally, can't make the difference anymore.  Those are the people that faith affect the most (wild personal guess). They "want to believe" and end up "not wanting to see reality".
Dilla.  KIDDING.   Khalifa 
Honestly, a lot of people within Ontario don't even realize this is a problem.   The thing is, the province loses $500 million to $1 billion annually in taxes that WOULD have been paid had the cigarettes been bought legally. Over 50% of our tobacco here is contraband, so it's a huge problem. It's also problematic in Québec, but Ontario more so.  These are tax dollars that could have gone to healthcare, schools, etc.   It's also an issue with parents because contraband cigarettes are so easily available to kids. A guy who's selling illegal cigarettes isn't going to card high school kids, right? So now we have kids smoking cheap cigs that should be costing a minimum of $6 (the cheapest brand here is around that much for a 20 pack) but the illegal ones can be as cheap as $2, and they're even worse for you than regular smokes. 
it needs more cowbell
[My favorite](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FTNheCEUP_A)
As a Lithuanian by heritage, a beer fanatic, and a certified sex machine, I concur.
Thanks, yeah I just noticed that. Another question is about how much force do I need to apply to the arm on the motherboard that encloses the CPU? Everything is lined up and there is a considerable amount of force needed to close it, MUCH more than without the cpu in it. It almost feels/sounds like i'm going to crush it if I put any more force on it.  Is this normal?
I think we're in the same boat today. 
I saw them play halloween a year ago. I think it was one of the two times they played it that tour.
They really should. I was getting my thief on, and was doing the manor mission. I had to get out quick when I was busted and wait for shit to chill. I snuck back in to see that fucking Lydia didn't bother getting her daft minge out when I did,and was instead slaughtering everything she saw.  I admire her gusto but god damn is she dumb.
[Ive Heard Something Similar](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GX0lV6tMvxo&amp;feature=related)
I'm pretty sure those millionaires will still be able to feed their kids when they have to pay an *extra 2% tax on income*. Not to mention that much of millionaires money they acquire each year is generally not even considered "income" so their real additional tax would be well below 2%.  If someone has to end up paying more, shouldn't it be the people that can afford it? Isn't that the christian thing to do? This is a christian nation right? I keep hearing that, but I don't see it.
Your headline was written in an overgeneralized way that belongs in either /r/politics or /r/circlejerk (it fits perfectly well in both places).  Next time please state the question in a less blatantly partisan way, such as "Why do conservatives prefer shorter census forms?" 
I am confused as fuck.  Thank you.
Yep, this'll be a valid reason to finally use a calendar.
Did I miss generation Y?
Daniel Day-Lewis is an extremely interesting person, but at the same time he's fucking insane about his roles. 
lawl you shouldn't be allowed on the internet at all
it holds more water as a 'typo' cuz the 's 'and 'd' are next to eachother  wait.. the intended letter was a 'b'.. fuck im high
I made one, just for you! [This happened a couple years back](http://i.imgur.com/GwVv6.png)
When I do flat bench I only do 225 because it's real hard.   But, I can lockout 345 from the top pin of the rack.   So I just do that instead. Is that bad?
I think so.
Well, actually, seems like you're wrong on the "vice versa" bit so your links kind of support sge's stance more than it contradicts it.  Also, Paul never said he'd choose Kucinich as VP, he said he'd consider him for a cabinet position.
Well my response was merely anecdotal.  Try it for yourself, on shorter fights, CL may be the way to go.  I just found that personally, if I didnt have 3+ targets and thus 3+ chances to hit fulmination and receive my mana return, I was ooming faster than preferred.  However, i did not notice enough of a DPS increase to personally justify this.  And also my belief in LB scaling with gear better is just that, a belief.  If I'm right, then by time you are fully decked in 378 and replacing with 397, you will be casting LBs no matter what on single target because it will be better dps.  At my stage of gear, CL and LB are nearly equivalent single target DPS, but they are vastly different in DamagePerMana.  Enough so that im not comfortable spamming CL single target.  To each his own though
i disagree. His head was low because immediately prior to that both Staal and Joslin got their sticks in his feet and tripped him up. Intent has never been a factor before.
Too ... many ... choices ...  Can't ... choose.   AAAAAAARG   On a serious note: one to sixteen. Can't pick 3. I tried.
And then, having followed it under the floor to the end of the room it [drops a power bomb] (/spoiler).  Never has a game cause such a panic.
That is just awful!  :(  And understandable.  My dad dying at an early age (I was an early teen) made me hypersensitive to death for a really long time.  It's taken more than ten years to cope with it.  I am better now, but certain things still trigger me for my dad, and the few days after his death, and it is just...ugh.  Certain music tracks, certain places, certain thoughts...  MAN, THIS THREAD IS A BUMMER NOW.
[sarcasm] Knowing that those two are enjoying X is ruining the sanctity of my X! [/sarcasm]  I don't like miss what's-her-face there either, but arguing that her promoting something makes you enjoy it less, is rather silly.  
Trolls? 
Instantly thought of that as well.  [](/rdsalute "ITS A GOOD DAY TO DO WHAT HAS TO DONE BY ME AND HELP MY BROTHER TO DEFEAT THE ENEMYS")
Either way it was still "Every one of you slimy bastards gets punished for Pansy's dumb ass"  I actually saw it more as "go to your room" than "Filch, you finally get to lock someone in chains"
Whenever I'm walking in a crowded hallway I brush hands with the people next to me. It's even better when people are just a little bit ahead of me because then I can reach up a bit and get their palms. They usually freak out and jerk their hands away.   I also like finding the radio station that the car next to me is listening to so that I can roll down the windows and turn up the volume really loud. Eye contact with strangers is fun. 
If I remember correctly there are more "slaves" in the U.S. now then any other time in history.
We are going to be Sith at release absolutely. It was just Dream and me.  She's my wife.  We really love Huttball and will probably be leveling almost exclusively with pvp.  If we don't get in on 5-day early access we are going to start over on the very first server they open after we get in.
Nope.  HDMI transmits audio digitally.  Controlling volume is done at the other end, either receiver or TV.  There's no hack for that.  However, you can use a universal remote as a substitute for the Apple remote, which would give you extra (programmable) buttons for that purpose.  
Good god no, all it will be is rehashing of the same joke that we saw 3 hours ago. Don't we have enough of that already?
personally:  hourglass&gt;thin&gt;Athletic&gt;thin with assets. but that is of the images presented. personally hourglass+athletic is my favourite. 
That is a solid first bong right there. Nice choice (:
Next set of pics come from the 1 month anniversary
After all the sci-fi, medieval and just plain silly items Valve found something unfitting?
Science.
With sunglasses on top of the bill?
I do this almost every night.
That's pretty cool alright, i was looking forward to trying out the kh2002 and the [MP7](www.youtube.com/watch?v=YjY0Us7NOns&amp;t=1m28s). Turns out now i have enough points for them.
Boo-the-fuck-erns.
looks like you forgot a word
Thanks. Like I said, noob question.
Are you looking for encouragement to lie in your job interview from r/atheism?   Um...I'm going to guess that most atheists still view lying as wrong. We don't need the bible to tell us that. It will come back and bite you in the ass one day. 
Anonymous isn't one person or one group
Tell her this is stupid, and yell at her if she keeps pressing you. Buy a spray bottle and squirt it in her face when she asks you the question. Around the sixth time she brings it up, pinch her really hard.
Superstar: CM Punk Diva: Beth Phoenix
No you don't. The woman is not taking responsibility. She behaved completely irresponsibly. Tough luck.
It's pretty awesome. agreed.
None, there never are.
Did this on the SAT. 2390. Eheheheh all my friends hate me for it.
Today is the day I start reading people's usernames before their posts...
Fo' Shizzle.
Can you see if you can set them up with https://www.dwolla.com/  unlike paypal they do not keep a % of the money.
yea well it takes time and effort to pick all the pork piece out of your rice you fuckin hippie.
meat mitten!
I call shenanigans.
lol at your fail list of pvpers. Only decent pvper on that list is Brad and thats cause i taught him myself.   Haters are my motivators bitch.
Yeah, scientology is a pretty dangerous cult that needs shut down immediately.  And their tax-free status should never have been granted.
this isnt me, but my best friend  i was living in a small city in Australia and i had some friends around at my rental property. long story short my best friend (last to leave) didnt put his cigarette out properly and it blew onto a couch i had on the patio. set the whole place on fire and the house had to get torn down.  so i figured i didnt have any stuff to move so now is the time to do it. i said goodbyes and moved to melbourne (it is like a 4 hour plane trip so i wouldnt be seeing a lot of people again). any way melbourne was really cool, met this girl, it was great. i was living with my aunt and uncle for a while so i decided to move in with my girlfriend, she was living with her best friend and her best friends mother.   then, maybe a year after i moved, my best friend finally saved enough money for a visit. he stayed with us and he hit it off with my girlfriends best friend. after another visit 2 months later, she moved up to my old home town to be with him. that was 4 years ago.  TL;DR: my friend burnt my house down so i moved, and that lead him to his long term gf
Total War: Kingdoms. Not as good, but it's made by Cavedog and I think it has dragons in it...
Tell me about it. I lived in Austin for eight years and moved back home to Lubbock (for some fucking reason). This place is weird. If it wasn't for Tech, despite its totally douchebag student body, this place would be one big retirement home. It's basically god's waiting room.
Teaching history correctly requires context, I would be surprised if putting 13 year olds in blackface would give them any appreciation for the hardships of slavery or even the racial hangover this country seems to have.   Unless you were to drop them into the middle of the inner city and pick them up a few hours later. You might lose a couple of kids but the rest would have learnt one hell of a lesson.  In my opinion though, the biggest problem with racism today is the amount of people not understanding that people might find things offensive.
1. Be confident enough to sing aloud! 2. Try to make up new lyrics on the fly along with a melody. 3. These melodies created using your voice are probably closer to the sound in your imagination than your lead playing and is therefore more musical than your lead playing. Play the improvised melodies created with your voice on your guitar. 4. Strive to make your music tell a story instead of making a flashy appearance. 
I'd probably hack WoW and convince their servers to permanently delete all user profiles with a character over level 30.  Why?  Why not?
We did the exact same thing except with very high items and only bombs-oms. We called it dodgeball and I agree it was awesome.
Are you using any mods to enhance the graphics?
and to think, when those cards were first introduced, they explicitly stated they were not to be used for identification.  
I went with a 1tb Seagate 7200rpm from ncix,  not ideal price but good enough for me
How much do you want to spend?
So is this an Anti-Godwin, you win the thread with a Jew?
What's wrong?
What's the maximum amount of $ someone can make (single income, single occupancy) and still qualify for benefits? Any sort of tests to pass or hoops to jump through as an applicant?
And keep your local window un-grouped from all your other chats.
Oh dear God yes, I refuse to give that guy 2 seconds of my time.
Have you seen our Govt? We have people who agree with Republican, even Tea Party platform...
What if the US is too big a target in terms of wealth and power for corrupting forces to take advantage of or rig the system?  Wouldn't that make any attempts to change the country while preserving wealth and power futile?
It's a climp = cat + blimp
They got their karma, now he got his. We have to wait and see whether or not the karma police will show up and take it back.
I really wanted to flame you, but I can see you've got problems all your own.  Take it light big dog!
I lost more than 2000 gold on that quest :(
*awesome*
Finally a post that went more than *okay*
Dam Rarity....U scary.
I am the only person in the household on keto currently and I manage to end up using some of the foods my parents also use.   here is a short list .   All the meats All the cheese Veg [broccoli, cauliflower, courgette, spinach, pak choi, pepper]  Creams [even some of the light creams are still great for keto] eggs   Some of the more specialist things I have to buy seperate to what everyone else will eat are Almonds, cashews Flax/linseed protein powder
True true, may wanna try [/r/SaltLakeCity](/r/SaltLakeCity) 
Pics or it didn't happen
Sephiroth's Masamune combined with Riku's Keyblade-thing (I can never remember the name of his).
It's impossible to fake IDs.
Over chatroulette
This made me laugh lol.
No, Reddit hates fundamentalist Christians and other religious folk that defy and get in the way of proven science. /r/atheism, on the other hand, hates christians exclusively and forgets that almost all other religions exist...except for when a muslim does something stupid.
No comments were removed; it was just that I wanted to capture the two points where he contradicted himself.  In fact I have a transcript of the whole thing halfway written up.  It will eventually be released, although I don't know when.
Ehh it's not really likely you'll gain much, but I guess to maximize gains in chest only while still losing weight you could eat at a surplus the day of the chest workout, and the day after the chest workout, while all other days are at a deficit. In theory that should help.
just looked at a map...  uhm, yeah wtf?  edit: that said, the 535 used to fully replace the 165 and the 80. But now that it's mixed, looping it does seem like a good idea.
I can empathize. The Journal of Justice was a component of the game that elevated it above 99% of other games: the fact that there is an actively-evolving 'world' surrounding the League keeps me interested in this game even when I'm not having the best of times in-game.  If they could do another show-match or SOMETHING (a la Ionia vs. Noxus), I would be enthralled with this game again. It helped me discover the ever-humble, infinitely-entertaining Guardsman Bob (with, presumably, thousands of others) and had lore and in-game consequences (namely the Ionian Boots of Lucidity).
meow!
[With awesome photoshopping.](http://i.imgur.com/MgJep.jpg)
And the dam will not displace any indian reservation, although it will evict people from riverside villages (and this people often are from indian descent but are integrated (are citizens of the Brazialian republic instead of any indian nation).  The usual procedure is build a new town somewhere nearby, commonly with slightly better living standards then their previous homes, plus the towns get royalties from the power plant (which usually get robbed/wasted by the mayor and town administration).  Problem is, Brazil is going to need power to expand its economy, even at the modest rates it has been expanding for the last decade, and that expansion will benefit the poorest drastically. Currently, hydroelectric power plants is the most rational solution, ballancing social and economic needs with environmental concerns.   The least environmental friendly solution would be keep them in poverty, in which case they will just chop down trees for the black market in order to make a living.
It may just blow over, but it may not. In any case, you should speak to the dept head and/or the VP about the teacher's inappropriate behaviour. I mean, you have a legitimate suggestion to a question in class and was accused of trying to cause trouble.  You should definitely speak to the VP about the bullying you're receiving as a result of it by the other students. It's not acceptable, and needs to go on record. The school will be responsible for it from there. If they don't act on it to reign in the other students, get your school board trustee involved.   Here's a suggestion when you speak to administration: you may wish to bring something to present as well. Maybe some stats about teen and gay bullying and suicide, or the It Gets Better videos, I think, are brilliant. You could give positive actions that the school can do as well. For example, maybe suggest a GSA club, or something that will help educate the students. I know you're getting a lot of crap right now for taking gay issues seriously, but you're definitely doing the right thing. As a straight friend to gays, thanks for being one too :)
We've all been through phases where we die a little bit inside at the thought of it :| Never heard of that one though ;)
 This may or may not be true but that is an awfully low bar you set as a standard.
Little round headed buffoon
I like min/maxed :p. I don't really feel the heavy destroyers partly because it's very easy to just wipe the unit and and because I could afford another triarch stalker or a 10 man scarab squad with their points which I think are much better.
The Israel/Palestine conflict is almost entirely religious in nature. What are you talking about? Is that a serious question?
Agreed.  Clicked this link to see Mr. Bean.
I really hope you guys can give us a game.  As exciting as its been to see LSU go undefeated, blowouts kind of suck.  The Bama game was good, but other than that, there haven't been any close games.  I'd like to see it close until like the 3rd quarter.  Nothing as close as the entire 2007 season was, though. That season made me want a pacemaker...
EXACTLY! I believe this is how Dwarf Fortress calculates its biomes.  Biomes should be dependent on the shape of the terrain, elevation, temperature, moisture, etc.... NOT the other way around.
its leblanc, and griefing is fun
Not at all....
I forget what's on his lapel there, but the USnavy, USArmy... Were his top donors (those might be included under We the People, though).  The fine print says the font size is proportional to the actual amount received, not relative amount received (except they had to shrink ACT BLUE for Edwards for readability).
I have all three, but I think the shaymin and darkrai are probably hacked (I got them from a used pearl game) . I don't really want anything in return, I just want them back.
Exactly! The signs are everywhere!
I have a feeling this was a victim of the console-simple interface.  And hiding status effects way down in the magic menu.
[](/b32 "This is an honest compliment, honestly!") You have an awesome crazy face.
How often can you even see my username?
&gt; are driven exclusively by profit concerns, not by concerns about what is best for the larger society.  What makes you think the people running corporations are so much different from the rest of society.  Poor people can be just as selfish jerks as rich people.  Furthermore more a rich person would be more able to express the views using their own money, where the poor would have to join together to from a non-profit corp to do so.
This why save file locking is such an issue. I want to back that shit up, but then we'd run into the same issue as Xbox 360 players and users would be hacking their saves. Can't win.
C'mon man, you're gonna tell me there was no filler?  How many scenes do we need where Shane reminds Lori that he saved them?  How many scenes did Andrea say she doesn't want to live or be with the group anymore?  How many scenes did we need Lori and Rick talk about whether they wanted Carl to live or not (big topic, I know, but still a redundancy)?  How many times is Maggie gonna give Glen the silent treatment like they're fifteen years old?  All of these scenarios happened multiple times and offered nothing new in the way of plot development or character insight.  Its not to say that they shouldn't have happened at all, but once is enough, let the viewer come to some conclusions themselves instead of beating us over the head with them.  You're right that a show solely about running from zombies would be boring, but just because there was a lot of dialogue doesn't mean that they "got into the characters", the dialogue has to actually be insightful, subtle, and progressive to make that claim.
worst case scenario you don't like morrowind and you are out 10(?) dollars  best case scenario, you have morrowind
It's a matter of practical necessity. Some people are dangerous to others, so we need to imprison them. (I'm open to alternatives!) But we don't need to execute anyone to protect the innocent.  Then there's the problem of a fallible justice system. Sometimes the innocent are convicted, and when we do fix the mistake, it often takes decades to do. I'd rather be let free with a big apology at the age of 75 then executed at 25. Especially in a society that treats prison as segregation and rehabilitation instead of punishment.
It might help you wrap your head around it, as well as help ensure she enjoys it, if you explicitly sexualize it. i.e. she has to clean or farm WoW items *while* wearing sexy lingerie. Or, she has to perform these menial tasks, after which she will get "rewarded" with an orgasm or "punished" with spanking. Approach it like a game, and it won't seem so serious.
They're not flirting with you.
BRETT I WANT CHA BEBBIES
That's great.. but some heroes are more suited to some roles than others..  and again, it depends on the definition of carry, which varies.
I know you cant see this but im flipping you off as hard as I can because im stuck at work  [](/ajlie"just kidding")
I think I need to jump on this wagon. Crackduck would flip his shit, son. 
Yeah brah I totally hate saving money brah totally brah downloading them for free is more manly brah. Yeah, brah. Let's get a beer and bang some bitches brah.
THERE WAS AN OLD LADY WHO SWALLOWED A FLY.
Doesn't matter had calories.
Mostly historical reasons, but also keep in mind that metric isn't all that intuitive at human-level scales.  I am 6'0" (six feet zero inches) tall and my friend is 5'9" tall.  In metric, that is 1.82m and 1.75m respectively.  The difference between 1.82 and 1.75 (0.8) sounds much smaller than the difference between 6'0" and 5'9" (3).  Many metric measurements become fractional at human scales, and I suspect people don't grok fractional/decimal number as well as nice whole numbers.  Sure, you could express height in decimeters, but for some reason that hasn't really caught on, probably for the same reason dekameters and hectameter never really caught on.  Finally, consider this:  if SI is so awesome, why don't we use metric time in everyday life?
True. The accuscore thing on ESPN says that we have a +70% chance of winning if Turner gets over 75 yards; a coinflip if not.  Not sure I agree with that totally though.
You need to post this in /wtf
We don't mind penis shots, as long as your face is involved. :)
Even funnier than [yesterday](http://karmadecay.com/i.imgur.com/GUDlu.jpg)!
No, i mean half life 3
I'm thinking contam. It would be a damned shame to design an underwater probe for Europa without planning for some serious biological investigation. You would want to take extra carefull precautions against false positives.
As someone who has worked in a lab before, I can guarantee you that it's expensive to develop and research drugs. I can definitely agree that these companies are greedy and jack up the prices to an extent, but it's still very expensive. For one, the tools you need can easily cost millions of dollars. The precursors (ingredients) can also be very expensive depending on what you are doing. Also, people sometimes don't realize how painstakingly delicate some of the lab techniques are. I worked in an organic chemistry lab so that's very comparable to pharmaceutical research. From my experience, getting good yield and getting a pure product (or purifying your crude product) are two VERY HARD things to do and they are VERY IMPORTANT to developing medicine. For reference, look into a drug called Thalidomide. One of it's enantiomers (which is a mirror image of the molecule, which means synthesis of this molecule produces a 50:50 mixture of these two enantiomers. It's generally VERY VERY hard to seperate enantiomers because they have the same chemical properties. However, enzymes in the body are sensitive to different enantiomers so the wrong enantiomer can cause a completely different response from the body) caused birth defects while it's other treated morning sickness. I believe ibuprofen is also synthesized as a racemic (50:50) of two enantiomers. Luckily the enantiomers of ibuprofen both do the same thing, one is just more potent than the other.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thalidomide#Birth_defects
Oh how do they compare?  I heard JK has one of the best teams in the UK
feel free to give a more plausible explanation.
Ya I have been feeling the same way, but I am so glad this guide game along as it is just what I was looking for.  As it turns out though, it seems Consular will be the one for me to go as I had initially thought, which really sucks since I am sure the other 2 classes will be in higher demand.  Off topic, I'm not a fan of the stats for DPS being the same as for healing.  It seems like a healer could still do really nice damage, and that would make them very powerful in PvP.  Then again maybe things like force regen (I think that stat is called presence) and other stats will be a requirement for healers, to make them weaker.  Also, maybe they were left out, but I'm not that happy about there not being many cool support spells that aren't healing/health related like WoW's innervate for example.
Because I've been through it, white knight.
Depending on where you live, you might even get *real* paneer, which is amazing.  If you don't have a big Indian/South Asian population, you'll probably get pasteurized paneer, which is just kind of like sour haloumi.  Not bad, but the real stuff is amazing.  Unpasteurized hand made cheese...
She's a fashionista, not the town's official gem finder, isn't she?
$190.00!! Amazon saves the day! I've grown used to paying top dollar and looking in all the wrong places. Alas! I've become a brand name who*e. Sunforce does it for about a third the price compared to bignamebrands. This predicament has been solved, thanks to you, naval_person. (**salutes**) Thanks/Merci
Good Luck Lucas. 
One time in high school I sharpened a pencil and carved "die" in my arm during math class cause I was bored. A large black girl that was bussed into our school from the inner city asked me about it, and then reported it to the administration. They sat me down and talked to me about it, and I told them I did it out of boredom. All in all I think I went to a fine high school. It ended with that, and I stopped carving stuff into my arms, even if I was bored.
How can you use Twitter? How should you use it? Practical advice on how to grow in one of the most successful social media websites.
How does that make it wrong? 
There is no "basic right" to set up camp and live indefinitely on public property, causing thousands of dollars worth of damage.  I don't understand how anyone could possibly be this misinformed.
A couch is a good idea. I'd probably get a new hard drive and a new computer chair. 
I did this for a year. The trash was the hardest part, because it just started to smell after a while, so I usually broke and took it out. But yea, as far as the living room and kitchen, everything was the roomates after 3 months. The dishes, the clothes, the trash...but she never broke down. I moved out. 
Are your parents fine with the idea that you make internet videos for a living?  Where there any problems that occurred because of this?
I would be happy simply having a link back to the reedit home page.  I do approve of timophy's header!
I try to tell people the Red Line is Hell's Cattle Car, but no one ever believes me.
this! 100x this!
Why, or where?
True, I have learned a good number of different languages though. Even brushed up a bit on Lisp and wrote some things in it. I eventually stopped using it when I realized a lot of cl is overly complicated than need be like ASDF or the module system which I spent weeks on and still I'm not entirely clear about. In contrast I understood the gist of haskell's modules pretty much within a quick read through. I'm sure I don't get all of it yet but it seemed more than human accessible. 
I can't believe we're still talking about this nearly a week later. But I appreciate someone with real experience chiming in. Thank you.
They look happy! Good... good... everything is going according to plan..
you can cover so much ground this way. i found that if i did it for too long my game would crash tho. guess it was an information overload?
Damn good toupee, I can't tell.
He can probably pick up a used one on Craigslist for a song. 
i've got one that's the HIV virus..
**L E T T E R C E P T I O N**  [](/derpyshock "We have to go deeper!")
What does this have to do with atheism?
It's...so...NEAT!! ( In both senses of the word)
I'm getting 2g for 20 bucks. (Northern Alberta) I already have a grinder and pipe and such so all I worry about is the trees. Smoking a bowl every night to sleep with 2g lasts me a week. ( sometimes 2 bowls )
A little bit old, but nice:  * Ascendancy * Master of Orion  strategic colonizing of the universe
totally worth it
I have laughed so effing hard at the second part.
I see what you did there.
the unibrow, you like? I guess that pick up line would have worked after all
TIL there's atheists in Texas 
It doesn't do anything but people still care for some reason. Doing a self post gives you comment karma, but that doesn't bother people.  I can't explain it.
Visine? Must have watched IPL3
Ron Paul said abortion is a state issue. Ron Paul [voted to federally regulate abortion](http://www.lewrockwell.com/paul/paul98.html). He even claimed in the linked piece that the courts made the "distinction" that a child within the womb is not protected under law, when the "distinction" they made was that a viable fetus is subject to protection under law and thus states can regulate post-viability abortions. The Partial Birth Abortion Ban is increased infringement on state's ability to decide on abortion.  Ron Paul signed a pledge to never raise taxes, support new taxes, or remove credits without offsetting them. Ron Paul voted to increase the tax burden for women receiving abortions and insurance companies that offer plans that cover them.   Ron Paul called Francis Bellamy an atheist in an attempt to criticize and discredit the man. It is hard to do *any* research on Francis Bellamy without it being abundantly clear that the man was a baptist minister and Christian socialist. You don't even have to [click the links in a Google search](http://www.google.com/search?gcx=w&amp;sourceid=chrome&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;q=francis+bellamy) to find the information   In the same [paper](http://www.lewrockwell.com/paul/paul205.html) where Ron Paul made the above claim about Bellamy, he also claimed that preventing federal courts from hearing challenges to the *federal* law that sets forth the pledge and how it is to be said is a protection of state's rights. If Ron Paul wants states to decide how they say the pledge, limiting challenges to the federal law that sets forth how it is to be said is not a way to reach that goal. This whole paper doesn't even make sense. It is not an abuse of federal power for a federal court to declare federal law in violation of the constitution and fighting to protect the federal law that sets forth the pledge is not a protection of state's rights. Just a few off the top of my head. Whether you guys like it or not, the man is a fucking politician and is not immune to playing political games.  
Dude.. I lost you at 'Happily lurking'..
The entire city I live in has banned longboards, skateboards, rollerblades, and scooters.   I just skate without my ID now, because I have no obligation to carry it unless I am operating a motor vehicle. The cops just make me walk it until I am out of their sight. 
Haven't had an issue but I'll know what's up if I do I guess.
"safe distribution"  That's when you snip off a bud, let it dry a while, and stuff it in your bowl.
I don't understand.
That, and she's dismissing the possibility that any of the concerns are valid.
Best username. 
No actually you're fucking wrong. I'm a love :D.
Is it just me or does she look remarkably close to Casey Anthony?
I think they figured it out much earlier than they let on.
This is the falsest thing I've read on the internet today.
As an architecture major, our coursework does pretty much half of this already. Statics and dynamics are required courses, our studios are built on analytic problem solving and the amount of work they give us and the supplies we're required to buy means that every week is new adventure in building sound structures, scrounging up 7 days of food on the $9 we have left after materials, and configuring makeshift sleeping quarters out of things we have lying around.   And creativity? We got creativity up the ass.
but the cops say they can't do anything.
it looks like you've only tried to ollie like 400 times but to get it right you need to try it like 67 billion times, thats all.
hrm.. in you efforts to sounds like a elitist jerk you have reinforced  the main reason as to why I got my law degree outside of the united states. legal scholars as much as lawyers determine judicial rules and procedure, especially in the area of international/human rights/war law.   you state "This is a place to discuss new and interesting legal developments from around the world." in the description... and for anyone to think that politics do not shape law and and judicial proceeding is just ignorant. if you want a "federal law" subreddit, edit your description. i, as much as everyone else of reddit, hate to be "down voted"  for encouraging discourse, this is still  the internet and the reddit population isn't less a troll because "we are lawyers!"  :)
If Sirinek doesn't work then search for it. Stop complaining about shit you didn't develop.
&gt;While it's ridiculous to contribute these to female privilege, complaining about these issues surely isn't.  I agree. If I can edit it, I will. :)
CHINCHY'S BIRTHDAY?!!??!?!?!?!?  Well, time to give the gift I always give: CHINCHY, I'LL WRITE YOU A SHORT STORY FOR YOUR BIRTHDAY, GIMME A THEME AND SOME PONIES!
As a redditor from a different Ohio school, I think I'm somewhere in between. 
OMG that's an intense robo-post.
You tap and hear a random moan. 
Ah, you caught me. I wasn't over there... a friend told me about it. Its like the religious station on the radio, there is something alluring to it, but its not healthy to concentrate on idiots to feel smarter. Also, did you know that science was invented to disprove god?!
When English people think you're Irish, it just means you're speaking with a strange accent they can't recognise. 
Blue..... no YELLOOOOOOOOOOW
Just in time.
I didn't do it. it was on the news in puerto Rico around 2005 or so. I mean things in puerto Rico have been in the shitter lately so if it was true it wouldn't surprise me.
yeah. I did one of those biology bacteria tests my Junior Year. The entire school was sliced into zones and divvied out for testing. The Carpeting was in the top 3 with showers and restrooms.
I get a print-out of my water quality once every 6 months or a year in the mail.  You'd have to pry that print-out from the bottling plant with crowbar made of subpoena if you asked for it.
Is he killing the same Sven over and over again?  Or was it just the most popular name around the time when they were born?
So can my netbook play now?
I really like that idea, how much should I add do you think? 1lb?
I sometimes think most of the new crop of politicians are all in on some big joke, trying to see who can say the weirdest shit and get into office. it's how I sleep at night.
[The sopranos](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-x5uO2NyWOQ) Spoiler in video title. 
We're talking about stds not pregnancy. Which is why the clean sailor dirty sailor wearing condoms has nothing to do with pregnancy 
Is it said I initially thought you were going to say it was a TARDIS?
Ah well, since the server was resetting I was taking almost any hit for hires.
Yes, as cost of doing business rises. 
ಠ_ಠ
Adjust your derailleur pal
I bet they wouldnt have wanted this photo to get out. Hopefully whoever took it wont get into trouble.
bro do not misuse my emoticon for this bull SHIT
Don't forget, "Ben all heckers!"
What this guy said.  Outplay them in the early game and reap the rewards later on.  There's a number of champions you could pick to counter any given lane, so try to do that.
Note to self: Do NOT hijack bus in Russia.
dual mags in black ops was the magazines that were taped together making every second reload equivalent to a sleight of hand
This almost killed me, and it makes my crafting decisions way harder. 
He's half japanese.
I ignore judgment. I am who I am, and if someone doesn't like that they can suck my non-existent dick. The only person who's affected me with their judgment so far, though, is my father, but even though he doesn't support my decision, he also wants to see me happy and successful, and loves me as his flesh and blood.  People dealing with harsh judgment (about anything, not just gender identity) need to realize that the people that matter will accept them no matter what the person throws at them.
Is it okay if I love you. Because I love you.
Tineye is decent for finding info and origins. Karma Decay is good for reposts
That's legitimately creepy how they can manage to get away with things like that.
**HIGH FIVE**
Forever Silver here, can confirm this.
Definitely had that scene in mind. [For anyone who hasn't seen it.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eTsKEgUJyUQ)  Lots of symbolism in that movie.
Be ugly. 
Several reasons:  * Because for me, it got personal. I'm an angry, outspoken atheist because religion nearly destroyed my life, and I want to save others from going through the harrowing shit I've gone through.   * Because there's no God to do it for us. I spent a lot of my life praying, as though it was accomplishing anything. All utterly wasted time.   * Because "No single raindrop believes it is to blame for the flood" (Despair.com). Every little thing we do, every cent we spend, goes towards making the world crappier or nicer. The world is full of people thinking they have no effect, all having an effect, good or bad. If you feel like you can't save the world, start with improving your tiny little corner of it, or at least start by trying not to make your corner of it any worse.
It may be mean advice, but you must admit it works.  "My car makes strange noises"  "Oh? Better buy a few more cars!"  ^_^
You're a fucking idiot. Fuck you for being weak.
i collect rock and mineral specimens
Well said, I myself like the more banger style, as I've found it harder to get into the more chill tracks. Great artists can mix the styles with excellent pacing and song progression.
It's a JOKE, like on TOP GEAR!
An earth tone madras patterned shirt would look interesting with an orange sweater.  Failing that I'd prefer something with a pattern to add a touch of flair, but that's just me.
Sweet, I was about to order my 580 (last piece needed) but I won't be building until after finals are over in 2 weeks, so I will wait until then to buy. Woo Hoo!
Who ever the fuck makes these needs to get a fuckin life.
I want to see what they're doing there too! Pass me the binocs!
&gt; people with bachelor's and master's degrees in the health sciences who outright denied evolution (While treating patients with a course of antibiotics designed to limit resistance)  http://i.imgur.com/CMocy.gif
Repost this to /r/metal, they'll love it.
Or I could really go nuts and Fly out to California to experience The French Laundry. :)
HAHA! YES! Anytime my buddy and I go motocamping, the topcase becomes a beer transporter and cooler.
Was their much fan concern that all these players wanted to leave possibly due to him in particular? Or was it just accepted they wanted more money?
I am not sure what trolling means. I am a urologist thats treats alot of men with low testosterone with testosterone replacement (www.uroantiaging.com) testosterone replacement causes a significant decrease the the quantity and quality of sperm and is pretty close to being a male contraceptive. It shouldnt be used as such and we only give testosterone to men who have symptoms.
I woke up and she was just lying there next to me.  It was really quite bizarre.
It isn't racist to ban them. It's dumb. The church basketball team is gonna get smoked just like every other year.
I wouldn't want *any* kind of eternal afterlife, to be honest. Eternity sounds boring. -_-  And no, I'm not taking this to heart. I just enjoy the speculation. :P
I was happy when Dawnbreaker (or whatever) from the Shivering Isles appeared in Skyrim. Though it doesn't "Sailor Planet Power Make-Up!" into the Duskblade at night, sadly.
Cunnilingus with my wife.
oh god, I had multiple nights dedicated to beating that thing
Best feeling ever? Best feeling ever!
Ok sounds good
It's all about how- "two internet people... become real lovers."
the jeans look fine, just get them out of your boots!
I don't think reddit hates Athletes, it just tends to ignore them, and as Captainnonchalant pointed out, there are active subreddits for sports.
I don't know if that is what you are looking for, but I really liked Michael Ende a lot (who am I kidding, I still do). Die unendliche Geschichte (personal favourite), Momo, and maybe Jim Knopf. Also Erich Kästner (probably best known for Emil und die Detektive).  All of those are full-fledged books, though. So I don't know if that's too much "small talk" for you :)
Oh wow, there's so much. It depends on what you want to do. Do you want to gamble? Go to shows? Go to some nice restaurants? Go to clubs?
What's bad is there were several times that if it were "real" I'd have done things much differently.  No matter what the shrink says about these people getting into the role and it becoming reality I find it hard to believe people would abandon the fact that they know it's just a "game".  * A "marauder" rides by on his Harley...sweet time to pull an Indiana Jones.   * Some giant muscle builder and his asian GF are stealing my stuff? STAB...  I loved how they staged the flamethrower scene blowing up the car ala a hollywood movie.
Military? Fuckin' figures...  These are the exact kind of people who shouldn't be given guns or any sort of power.
Other than this story coming forward there have apparently been no reasons at all to suspect that the students were getting anything other than an exemplary education experience under his watch.  Pulling your kid out of his classes because he made a porn a while back would be idiotic.
I chuckled from the mental image of this.  "sucksqueezebangfart from reddit asks, ..."  lol.
You can play GBA games on the DSi with flashcarts. The 3DS is fully backward compatible with the DSi hardware. If you have the proper emulation software built for the system, you can run *any*. *game.*
He came at you bro! 
As a kid who didn't have internet when he first got Ruby, the braille part was bullshit.
TIL.  I was misinformed by someone at the Occupy Flint base camp.  Damned hippies.
When there is a power vacuum, something (govenrment) steps in to fill the gap.  It's inevitable, IMO.  What we currently have is one of the best balances between peace &amp; stability and violent tendency that has existed on such a large scale. What would replace it (inevitably) would very likely be much worse.  A feudal system, a theocracy, a dictatorship, fascism, or combination thereof.  Anarchy works at reggae festivals, for the space of a weekend.  That's about the extent of it IMO.
TIL Giant dicks roam the Earth while we sleep.
Israel's net migration rates are falling, and as it takes more and more of Palestine there are concerns over the ratio of Israeli Arabs to Israeli Jews. This attempt at easing that problem is likely to anger many. It implies that there is only a one time right of return.
See, I think you're lying...  First you're all:  &gt; "*[they're] just like everyone else*"  and then you say:  &gt; "*they were all incredibly wholesome, healthy, happy, good people*"  That's a giant hole in your story and the whole thing  just doesn't add up.  ;)
Of course.
I tend to think, "What kinky things are you two into that your daughter has no idea about?" Then I picture them having sex while we talk about politics.
Is your injury permanent or a temporary thing?
Literally scares the shit out of you.
what a surprise, this thread turned into an r/atheism circlejerk.  and the answer is perfectly clear, the greatest obstacle is corruption
Haha you guys and your "dark vans".. there's been one parked on the street outside of my house for half an hour now, and nothing's happened. I know, I know... "they're waiting for you to respond to this thread, then they'll pounce". My question is, who is "they?", and so what if they just got out of the van and are walking towards my house and insi  One more. We dare you. -They
Everyone starts as one fool.
Could you explain?
Well my parents are pretty traditional, but very progressive as well, specifically my dad. My siblings are very much like myself, since we all grew up here. 
Yeah if you don't go to High Hrothgar you don't get any shouts, afaik.
Wait was this the Flash vs Effort finals? Everyone here, I advise you watch that series right now: http://wiki.teamliquid.net/starcraft/2010_Korean_Air_OSL/Elimination_Bracket#Final
Anytime I see someone try to adopt the terminology, 'apologist,' I know I'm dealing with someone who is a Fox News sympathizer.   Sorry...it's that kind of terminology that makes you sounds like a biased, misinformed idiot.
you clearly need to push down harder. :)  just make sure you have some padding under it
Lol I might know you then!
This is exactly the question I had a few years ago: how can one visualize the estimated evolution of one's budget in the next few months, to plan purchases or projects such as vacations, etc.? I then started building a new application with a friend, to manage just that.  The key to our work has been to find a way to estimate the evolution of a personal budget over time.  We now have many users in France, who use it to plan and monitor their budget and projects. We just published the english version of the tool, and the next step for us is to see if it fits user needs in the US and other countries, who may have different spending or budgeting habits. Maybe you would like to give a shot? Our application is called BudgetView, and you can find it here: http://www.mybudgetview.com We'll be happy to have your feedback, and see how we can taylor the tool to suit your needs. What do you think? Régis.
Laba diena! Alaus visiem!
With the price vs quantity being so awesome for Thayers it seems worth it to waste a little when it drips out of your hand. I usually apply in sections so I pour just enough to do my kneck then cheeks etc.
read the whole: http://amaditalks.tumblr.com/post/13513981784/siri
also use chrome shoes with platforms &amp; cages. they're holding up really well. picked up mine off of ebay for around $50, i think in unworn condition. 
As a regular city civilian...I find it hard to fathom that water in nature can be so clear. If only I was more an extreme sport person who could go where few people go to see the true beauty that is nature.
[Going Quantum](http://itunes.apple.com/us/podcast/the-going-quantum-podcast/id453734901) has everything you are looking for. He spans liquid dubstep, electro, DnB... but all good shit. All the podcasts are free too. Start with Episode 8
That's exactly why I don't work with the public.
Thank you! I had some guy on here telling me that UAV is pointless  The only thing I feel about having a high K/D is I see it as not helping your team, because you're looking out for yourself more than anything. That's why I never judge someone of a 20 whatever KD to be good. If you can get that 20 KD but still manage to help your team, then you are good in my books
I don't have to let you know from this time to tell you it works.  I already claimed this year for a strike a bit earlier in the year.  Of course the finance department knows me by now and don't fight; they tried to the first time I pulled a stunt like this in my first year.  They backed down once they consulted their legal counsel.
That was a million dollar punch.
No, you could not. Gender plays no role in taxation, neither does race. Further, there is no entrance requirements or anything else.   There's nothing in my statement that is even remotely related to taxes. 
Except that the 'market' isn't a magic machine that automatically chooses the best prices for everyone or necessarily improves the economy for everyone - shady practices are obfuscated, monopolies emerge, market freedom isn't the same for everyone, etc.  Absolute belief in the market is a naturalistic fallacy.  Economics just describes *how* things happen, not what *should* happen.  It's like using meteorology to say that hurricanes are okay.
I like to clap on the off beats of someone else's clap.
I was always wondering, how tall are you?
It's not right, but it is fun.
The lack of a system like chip and PIN in the US just boggles my mind.
The irony of it being that the giant mechanical spider that I know of is actually Canadian.
3 &amp; 4 are the only ones I really like with those jeans.  Hard to judge what the other would look like with different pants (darker wash &amp; slimmer fit hopefully).
lol, the greatest text book ever written...
hell yeah.   i work at a video game library (foreal) at school and people are on SSB:B every damn day! gotta love the original though. 
Well when I wrote it there were 4 comment threads, 2 "clearly recognize the distinction between civil unions and marriage", the other was a joke (but seemingly based on a false premise) and the was what my comment was mainly aimed at.  Which has now been corrected. Anways, the cricket's on... 
Wait a second, something's not right here. Google would never let you finish typing like that. Hey this guy's a phony, a great big phony!
Harpo was always my favorite.
Oh my god...Reddit...I think this is Rob Ford...the Mayor of Toronto, Canada...he's a totally jack-ass and he's trying to close down the libraries...xD
What about in 10 years when they can grow you a penis?
I'm not sure if you spelled feel wrong intentionally or not. Please help me I don't know if this if funny or not Oh wait, never mind, it's funny either way.
This.
I told Link "it's okay, you can cry! I won't think less of you!" ...and he didn't.
you sir have excellent taste.
Tell your cousin that I want to bone him.
I think it's a great idea, I'd love to do it! My only concern, what if this post grows to thousands of responses. Are you going to maintain all these people and update the number generator? I think you should take it to a mod to make it easier on your self. That said I'm looking forward to it! :)
Do not try to repeat this? I'm grabbing my three ladders and black friend now.
Correct, but when he was threatened with that, to my understanding and what paperwork I've been able to find through PACER he folded like a wet cardboard box when they threatened him with that. I had one arrest where I was initially facing seven years in a maximum security facility due to the nature of the charges. I eventually did 60 days; I didn't give up anyone, I just didn't fall for the crap that a lot of people fall for, didn't talk to the police, stood on my right to remain silent, and continued to insist I was not guilty and request a jury trial. After several months of this with the DA lowering the time offered and severity of the time I finally accepted when it was a deal that I felt I could get no better than, and that the DA would not improve.
'libertard'  do you even take yourself seriously?
I agree that it's good to ask. But honestly, as long as my partner isn't in a phase of a cold sore, whether or not he or she has oral herpes wouldn't make me say no to a blowjob ; )
Lol, no, I have to REALLY think about what I'm typing
Why can't you take them into your spare room, that is a kid for crying out loud!
I suspect foul play, but that is how I roll so it is probably nothing.  I was on there for all three pre-sales, and started clicking at 9:59, as did everyone I know.  No tickets for anyone, but tons immediately went up on the scalper sites, which are connected to the first bank center.
As a person living in a somewhat isolated community, would you think I would have to move to get any sort of interview or possible work from voice acting?
well the fact it's only really big enough to clamp the front wheel, you need a chain or rope to reach the frame from there, a d-lock wont reach.
I chuckled. :D.  I'm not really much of a coder yet, but i'll be taking some courses next semester. I'll keep this in mind.
You were a lil bitch if you had to have the crust removed. there i said it.
More people? You have 600k views. Congrats though. Great animations.
Old news, shitty channel.
You need to reduce spell cost. Enchanting is an absolute must-have for mages. People whining about 100% cost reduction have not played a late-game mage.
true. But he brings up homosexuality specifically. It contradicts the claim that it's only in the OT and not in the New.
That's short?
Hey there. I'm in New York and the age difference is only two years. I'm a musician and actor and I spend way to much time for my own good playing video games. Let me know if you ever want to chat.
&amp;#3232;u&amp;#3232;
&gt;what will it do to people who rely on RELIGION  Not being trite, but there are only a few possibilities. 1. Retreat further into the warm embrace of willful ignorance 2. Face their fears and learn what they can 3. Ignore all evidence to the contrary and continue to believe, possibly redefining any bits that are painfully not in alignment to make it easier to digest.  Given human nature and history, most believers will choose #3. This is why we have a God of the Gaps fallacy and failed arguments such as irreducible complexity. The sad thing is that most their need could be met by a philosophy rather than a religion, such as humanism. Over time, as parents put less effort into indoctrination, I expect this to be less of an issue, with fewer seeking religion as a means of facing death, and more seeking actual answers, or accepting the possibility that death is final. 
Oh no, that means my baby will be soothed by old school west coast gangster rap. I crank it while in the car, and will continue to do so.
Nope. Can't edit it. Fucking work computer. Sometimes I can edit, sometimes I can't.
It just means you were innovative. 
oooh, If you're in the area this weekend, we could facilitate a meet-up. message me if you want to hang out!
It has a blue apron, it's Auburn, and this is located in Auburn.
Only if you want to make 40$ an hour plowing snow. You could pay for the plow in a few storms.
I don't think she meant it as an attack and I am thrilled your experience was different.  But there are two VERY key differences -- no prenatal alcohol exposure, and a loving family prior to adoption.  That's the whole key with many older adopted kids is that if nothing else, there was very likely just neglect and possibly abuse in their young lives prior to adoption, and it sounds like this wasn't the case for your son.  I suspect you won't have nearly the same issues we had, but if your instincts tell you something "isn't right," try to be proactive rather than reactive.  best of luck to you.  
Yeah I haven't downloaded anything yet. (I have xbox but apparently there are still problems)  About the thane, thing, though. I was only able to tell a guard I was the Thane one time in Whiterun. Since then, I've never been able to say it to anyone in any of the holds where I am currently a Thane.
Thank *you* for that comment ;)
Too bad that concert was riddled with bludgeonings, tramplings, and rapings.
My girlfriend is Lithuanian, saw this on my monitor and laughed :)
How'd you manage to get that??
Given enough time, a man can always drop a load when needed.
He's actually one of the biggest icons in fresh water fishing, bloopers don't make them a bad Angler.
i remember them being described as bear like, i pictured them with more of a beast-like face and head after reading that, and shaggy to the point of looking more like a bear.
Mythbusters did an episode that checked a bunch of MacGyver myths. Most of them actually worked. A lot of his MacGyverisms were thought up by scientists and engineers who were employed to look for MacGyver-like solutions to the problems for the show.  Obviously you can't do the more ridiculous things he did like build a plane out of bamboo.
Your emotions about it will become tempered over time.  But, you will never ***fully*** trust the other person again.  You will always be suspicious of that person - even if it is only in the back of your head and you never say or do anything.  You will have to remind yourself - *that* is in the past - I must move on.  But, that little voice in your head keeps talking...  Ultimately, you have to decide if it is worth it - but, it never goes away.  Even with someone new, when you have no reason to distrust, you will think it - and the logical you will tell you that the new person has done nothing to deserve this - and therefore you will not likely say or do anything.  *Innocence lost can never be recovered...  We were all innocent, once...* 
Since this is r/trees, what is the safest way to get the red out as Visine says?
my favourite bit of yours was the inside so-cal! please do another one! it was great! any plans to do more stuff with that guy?
Seems like a good idea, except I wouldn't be willing to waste gas for that. Especially with the current prices.
Oh hey, Art Director here to give you a serious answer to this.  First thing's first, you need to understand something. Advertising doesn't exist because someone wants to sell you something. Advertising exists because TV Companies, Cities, Websites, Magazines, everything else wants to make money.  Think of it this way, when a company makes a magazine that's say 200 pages they will only fill 100 of it with editorial content. The rest they leave blank because they want corporations to buy the ad space.  It's the same reason why a normal sitcom is only 24 minutes long, they have to make space for ads so someone like NBC or CBS can make revenue.   If there would be a world without ads it would hurt normal people the most. A newspaper without ads would cost $4 when it should cost $1. Network TV wouldn't be free anymore and would cost you maybe $40 a month. Tolls on highways would skyrocket because there would be no billboards.  Now I'm sure you say that we can just go by stuff like donations or subscriptions. Have you ever listened to NPR or watched PBS? Half or even more of their on screen time is spent asking for contributions.  Also look at how it is right now. If you own a TV you can currently watch  a show like How I Met Your Mother for free... yet people STILL pirate it online.   Also I don't know what you're talking about when it comes to stuff like the New York Times. That and all newspapers are dying hard right now, even with subscriptions and paywalls. In fact, paywalls are the main reason they're dying even faster. Are you oblivious to all the buyouts that are happening with every single newspaper?  People don't realize it but they're being just as greedy as corporations for wanting a world without advertising, because they don't know what the ramifications would be without it. Hate that you're paying for $60 for cable with ads? Well without ads it would be $120.   Think about it this way, why is it that a magazine like Cosmo can be sold at $6 but an art magazine which is the same size and made of the same material be sold for $12? Don't listen to the bullshit, it's not because of the content inside, it's because of the ads. Coca-Cola would gladly pay $200,000 to Cosmo to have ads in there while an artist will pay maybe $1,000 to the art magazine for the very same space for an ad. At the end of the day both magazines are in the same place and have to account for the same amount of costs and the consumer ends up getting the short stick.  Seriously, people just need to understand that ads exist only to make things cheaper and make stuff more available. Why is it that services like Pandora and Spotify exist but still need ads? It's not because they are looking to nickel and dime you, it's because even when something is free you still need to upkeep the servers and have a staff to work on it.  I don't get what's wrong with our generation, if you don't like an ad why not just ignore it? Are you really that ungrateful that you can't enjoy a TV you want to watch if it has commercial breaks which allow that show to exist?   Don't tell me that pirating them or watching it online is a viable solution too. If you like your show support it by watching it in it's timeslot. No one gives a fuck if you go on TPB and watch it later, in fact you're even worse because in terms of analytics you are not on the grid at all. That's how shows like Community get canned despite everyone liking it. Those same people who like it don't watch it when you are supposed to. 
Most stupid thing I have seen on reddit all day... why is this in rage topics?  It shouldn't even be on here.. wtf is this shit.
woah that would be sweet! Good idea!
You gauge things on how pretentious they are?  On a weekly basis?
It's subjective.  From a strict perspective being able to pay for all of your bills is "enough". Let's say that amount is X. Let's say having enough money to have a comfortable life on top of that is Y. Let's say any more than that is Z. If Z is as much as X plus Y, no problem. Ten times X plus Y? That's all right. A hundred times X plus Y? A thousand times? Ten thousand times? That seems to me as though one family having that much is a little silly.
Tell him to pull out his dick, then you pull out yours and you both measure. Biggest gets to keep the girl.  On a serious note. Its best not to do anything or just swoop in and grab your girl on your way to another room.
Midas is the opposite--he was delayed too long. The first version of him didn't have a blink. Instead, he had a vector wall, putting him much more heavily into a support role. He was supposed to come after Moraxus or Myrmidon (I don't remember which) but was delayed continuously. He was delayed even further when Empath was chosen before him, meaning he could no longer have a vector wall. I gave him an ability called "Black Powder Blast" instead, which was basically just an expanding PBAoE damage ability. But when we finally picked Midas to enter the queue, I was told that it was too similar to Amun-Ra's Ignite, so I had to make it different yet again. That's when it was modified into the final version.  Sylph actually had a very similar fate. She was supposed to be added before Empath (and I was told that she was going to be), but then Aluna was inserted into the queue, and because Aluna fulfilled a somewhat similar role to Sylph, she was delayed. Then again, when Sylph was about to enter the queue, we picked Emerald Warden, which delayed Sylph even further.  EDIT: To clarify even further, I don't regret giving him a blink. It fit perfectly because it gave him that positioning advantage to shoot off his skill shots. I do regret, however, releasing him at a time when almost every one of our heroes had an escape. It really skewed public perception negatively.
It doesn't matter in everyday driving but on the highway it does wonders. I have a MPG gauge on my Scion and it averages higher when ever I use cruise. Plus CC usually keeps engine speeds at the best (and constant) for a given situation (as long as the engine/tranny is doing alright) so the ride is a lot smoother. 
Not surprising. Real life is its own punchline.
What's so bad about Tebow? I'm no Tebow fanboy or anything, but I just don't get why everyone gets so pissy that he thanks God. The only reason we hear it on TV is because the media always shoves a camera in his face wherever he shows up. That's not his fault. He has done a shit-ton of charity work and given back to the community much more than a lot of the hardcore Christians we bad-mouth do. Why should he thanking God for success and praying on his own on the sideline be such a bother to us. He's not imposing it on anybody, or using his platform to deliver sermons or lead stadium-wide prayer circles. He's relatively to himself as far as the religion goes, despite being a public figure, and I don't think it's right to condemn him so much. Live and let live. 
What would a pitcher of the HIV virus look like?  Is the actual virus colored?  
Thank you!  And thank you all for watching :)
I'd never heard that before! VERY interesting! :)
Yup, experiencing the same thing.
I literally just bought Battlefield 3.... But I could do that trade anyways. I assume its a Steam code? and its the NVidia code but I could get the steam if you want, or if you wanna do all that I can give you the code as it is now. Your call
You've been celibate a long time, haven't you? ha ha ha
Hiring illegal immigrants, disregarding safety standards, encouraging workers to go on government aid, low wages...  Oh wait, that's only in the US and other countries where they can get away with it. In Europe, Walmart seems to do everything it claims would bankrupt it. Funny.
Austin sounds interesting. Although I haven't the faintest idea what to do there. Would I just end up drinking?
Prepared for racism. Happy it didn't come.
You don't always want the infrared. Let's say you're using this light outdoors that infrared is completely wasted as it beams into the environment.  Also regarding the different incandescent coloration, isn't it based on the colors and mix of the phosphors on the inside of the glass.
*♫ On the first day of Hothsmas my Padawan gave to me... ♫*
I let my players use wisdom checks for this.
How the fuck... this is just mind blowing. I'd like to know how the fuck they managed to make a game like this back in the 14th century.
Kind of difficult when the lake catches fire. 
I saw that score and that's what made me so curious.
Can someone explain the point of a hard-capped frame rate?
I agree. If you're a die hard atheist you'd realize that a baptism doesn't mean anything at all, so if the other part of the family insists on it I would probably argue against it but in the end give in for the greater good. You'd have plenty of non-religious time with your offspring to counter.
Don't change a thing. Keep being nice. If a guy expresses interest in you and you don't feel the same way, just be honest. The friend-zone is always the result of a lack of communication.  Unless of course you routinely strip naked and jiggle your breasts in front of your male friends. That could be taken the wrong way.
On the other hand, because VAT really is a national rather than city-by-city thing, the VAT rate really is a huge point of contention over here, and could easily be something that elections are fought and won over. The coverage of any changes to the rate really is quite extensive. (The current UK Government increased VAT to 20%, whilst the opposition wants it reduced to 17.5 or 15%).  (Because businesses need this information, many receipts will indicate how much of the total was paid as VAT.)
Looking at the star trails you know it's longer than 5 minutes for that exposure. Anything over 30 seconds gives a blur.  I don't know that he did anything other than low ISO bulb mode.  There's a possibility he ran around and lit up things with a flashlight a little however as the hydrant in background looks a little too bright compared to surroundings.  EDIT: oh fucking stupid me there's text at the bottom of each photo.  For the first one it's "4 minutes, 6 seconds with added flashlight"  So yeah just about 5 minutes sounded right.
its..its so SQUISHY!!!!!
no one needs to. defining god into existence isn't an argument.
where was the funny?
You could say Monsanto has done the same thing. &gt;_&gt;
lol, the "e" i put in gentlemen in the top sentence, which is multiple men, should be an "a". He is one person so the "e" becomes "a", gentleman. 
It is unavoidable if you walk anywhere near it.
Even with much of this in mind, it does little more than excuse the actions of the lower down Stormcloaks, the warriors and such. Ulfric and any other politically knowledgeable members of his inner circle? They knew the exact circumstances of the Talos ban and what was at stake, they know what sort of threat the Dominion is and that a united Empire would stand a better chance against it than a divided set of provinces. They just don't care, because they want power, and that's what Ulfric has proven time and time again. While I can understand why many Nords would be swayed by the talking points of the Stormcloak rebellion, Ulfric himself is an inexcusable power hungry bastard who will let his entire homeland, or even all of Tamriel, be plunged into chaos and death before he bows his head to anyone he considers to be his lesser.
yea it's weird as fuck man, i took 1mg and i felt high as fuck and 7 did hardly anything a week later..
It looks like she might be able to fit both a magician and a genie up there so who knows.
Could anyone more qualified than myself comment on the "truthiness" of these claims?
best use for a trap: bandits placed spit with meat on a fire trap that was always on flamey mode. 
thanks
HAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA   It's funny because it's RAPE! Get it? Hilarious!
Unless they just overlook it, I'd imagine they view it metaphorically.
Shhhhh you're on Reddit man!
I have a bit of a fat pouch and it sort of casts a shadow (not sure if that accurately describes it?) right at the base of the penis. Found that out after shaving a few years ago, never done it since. It simply did not look good.
It's not a religion thing, my mom is just... thinks she's a doctor and knows more things than anyone else. Like a super cancer caused from tampons. She also doesn't get us vaccinated and doesn't want to get any of our animals fixed. :|
And people like you are the reason that many people feel Atheism are assholes.  Im not even a Theist and you sure are an asshole.
Eh it's more a personal preference. I dislike java as a language as a result i gat annoyed making mods
See, now all of reddit is watching.  Welcome to your 15 minutes (2 days?) of internet fame.  MAY IT BE GLORIOUS AND MAY YOU DRINK THE BLOOD OF YOUR ENEMIES.  And y'know, don't fail physics because you're too busy being horny.
I think you're vastly overestimating the intellectual consistency and standards of the average GOP voter.
Still think Liam Neeson would've been better.
Yep, but the tricky bit is in identifying what is conflict, and what is non-conflict. Currently, there is no reliable way to do this quickly.  I worked on research on how to independently verify where the minerals come from. There are some field methods now, but nothing commercially viable.
So, why would you do it? O.o
I love those suspenders.  I'm just having the damnedest time finding something to wear underneath.  D:
You make the assumption that being a speaker of the English language, you know how to use all of its punctuation. There are many English speakers that do not know how to speak with prepositions without ending sentences in them.
Welcome to the club :)
This is a real inspiration, too see so much progress in only 30 days! I have just started on the 28th of this month i guess, I was thinking of the c25k program, How do you find it if you dont mind me asking?
ASS CLOWN
Sometimes your gut knows best.  Tell her the truth, that you think his behavior pretty shady, but inconclusive towards cheating, and she needs to trust her instincts.  She doesn't need to have actual proof he's cheating to leave.  
Get him a knock-off Philly Jagr jersey.
That made me laugh out loud.
Terrible how exactly?
I made the mistake of buying Oblivion. Skyrim hype is a repeat, but this time they are astroturfing the product on places like Reddit.  Permadeath makes the game infinitely more replayable and adds suspense to playing. Ascii interface enables autoexplore and fast combats, compressing epic adventures to couple of hours of gaming. There's no way to reproduce these features in the type of games like Skyrim.
Skyrim and Reddit are how I will survive the Holiday Season in the service industry.
Yes, the idea that Satan/the Devil/Lucifer is in hell is actually from extra-Biblical sources.  That popular image of the Devil currently torturing people in Hell is un-Biblical  According to the Bible, Satan is still upon the earth:  First, [Job 1:6-7](http://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=job%201:6-1:7&amp;version=ESV): Now there was a day when the sons of God came to present themselves before the LORD, and Satan also came among them.  The LORD said to Satan, "From where have you come?" Satan answered the LORD and said, "**From going to and fro on the earth, and from walking up and down on it**."  Similarly, in [1 peter 5:8](http://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=1+peter%205:8-5:8&amp;version=ESV) - Be sober-minded; be watchful. **Your adversary the devil prowls around like a roaring lion**, seeking someone to devour.  I'm not all knowledgeable on this issue either, so I found this breakdown of Biblical references to the Devil to be helpful: [list here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Christian_teaching_about_the_Devil#Sources_of_Christian_teaching)
I was mostly thinking of it as humor. But thank you, point taken.
It doesn't matter for Nigeria, they'll just get money from China in exchange for access to its oil.
more people in this biased thread agree with you than me? fuck, i'm gonna go kill myself now over these downvotes
When you're done condescending, I'd like to discuss your strikingly similar pretentious tone.
The Oscars started, like, 70 years after Lincoln died. Unless you mean Daniel Day-Lewis, who has 2 best leading actor oscars.
How did it feel to slap Nicepeter in the latest Epic Rap Battles of History?
There were a lot of times where that show was fucking hilarious, even I'd you could see it coming from a mile away. 
Man, your country is messed up...
It is going to sound weird... but a trade secret I have done that always seems to work is if you take your thumb / index finger putting one on each side of her clit after you wet it with your tongue. Then pretend it is your cock and basically jerk her off you can get some pretty intense orgasms out of her from this. I can post a video to what I mean later since Nina Hartley describes in a instructional video. GOOD LUCK!
I feel like this is a very important question and will be extremely disappointed if it is not answered.
This was circulating Facebook long before this post.  Still a very powerful and important message.  Oh, and also more points for Iowa.  
i wouldn't try to practice any specific technique, as you are likely to develop bad habits. what might help though, is something like [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fltDtllngTg) (this one is mainly ground focused, but you get the idea) to get your body moving in the 'judo/jiu jitsu' way (using your hips etc). some drills require partners, but there is still a lot of solo drills. another one is [here](http://grapplingdrills.com/) but it is currently sold out (i think you can sign up for a heap of free ones though, i can't remember the specifics).  good luck!
Both have a facepalm. Deja Q is the more famous one though.  3x16: The Offspring  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=13eDfrMgFQM  3x13: Deja Q  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_SgMStDRtHk (can't find it in better quality, sorry)
I don't really mind nickelback. I mean sure, their songs lack any sort of depth whatsoever, but that doesn't mean they're the worst thing ever to happen.
Try working at sea on a ship. 
Last word on the Facebook page was they were shipped to him and he was signing them. So much for them "shipping" the week after the game was out
anyone who claims they would have lost their shit and done something absurd are lying. You all damn well know you would have taken it just as he did. Get pissed but get rid of the person. If you had a real problem youde call a manager and have them "be the bitch" because he also knows that to get rid of a customer is better than the bitch/outburst festival others think they would pull
Oh... It's been a few days since they haven't had replied to anything nor submitted squat... I was wondering how such an active person could go away like that... Now I have a clue. (yeah, my giftee is an American student)
Right on all counts!
I always used to read Gamepro, but since they moved away from the cartoon characters, it seemed like they were trying to hard to be a "real" magazine. The humor was just not there anymore. But I will always remember the good old days
Hey hey hey, you also learn how to ass around in paint mourning the death of g dropping.
Agreed, sc2 was my first rts and I had no problem sitting at the top .05~.  Diamond/masters/Grandmasters are all pretty shit. Eventually you start hitting people with "the talent" and you just start dying hard core.  Til then, lolz 2-3 base timing pushes dont forget upgrades yayayyaa
Everyone read this too... Just happened today  http://www.reddit.com/r/occupywallstreet/comments/mve9u/ibmalgorithmics_launches_its_hedge_fund_reporting/
fantastic advice. 
I will recommend this to him
Yeah, the problem is most of her fans don't realize she is being ironic and thus consider her music great. 
chocolate letter S!
i wouldnt say i hate the english, but in most sporting events prepare to be un supported by me (its not that i hate you its just that its fun to root for the other guy)
Yep. If there was a way to make it my major I would.
IT'S ALL RELATIVE TO THE SIZE OF YOUR STEEPLE  oh wait, too soon  Oh wait, too late
I was making a joke at your expense. Much love&lt;3
Now that's a beard, excellent, excellent job sir. 
They usually just think I'm asleep.
You just gave nut jobs a "really good" reason to commit animal cruelty.
&gt; Israel, supported by the United States, has been fighting the Nazis for 63 years. That Iron Wall approach, which sees all of Israel’s enemies as reincarnations of Hitler (as in Jeffrey Goldberg’s propagandistic assertion that Hezbollah and Hamas “specialize in the slaughter of innocent Jews”) has been a calamitous failure. It has not made Israel safer. As even center-right Israeli politicians like Tzipi Livni now recognize, it has resulted in Israel becoming increasingly isolated from the world, much of which now sees it as a pariah.  &gt; And Israel will not be given another 63 years. If it continues down this path, aided by its false “friends” in the U.S. who insist on fighting Hitler-redux to the last Israeli (and the last American), Israel is doomed. But if it abandons its self-defeating Holocaustology, it will be able to live in peace with its neighbors and join the world.  -- Gary Kamiya, ["The boys who cry 'Holocaust'”](http://www.salon.com/2011/11/22/the_boys_who_cry_holocaust/), *salon.com*, 22 Nov 2011  I would only add that the Zionists have become the very thing that they pretend to hate. &gt; Hitlerism is Satan's nationalism. The determination to rid the German national body of the Jewish element, however, led Hitlerism to discover its "kinship" with Zionism, the Jewish nationalism of liberation. &gt; Therefore Zionism became the only other party legalized in the Reich, the Zionist flag the only other flag permitted to fly in Nazi-land. &gt; It was a painful distinction for Zionism to be singled out for favors and privileges by its Satanic counterpart.  -- Stephen Wise, *Congress Bulletin*, quoted by Lenni Brenner, *Zionism in the Age of Dictators*, p. 85-86  Fascism is the ideology of national suicide.  The choice between New Israel and Old Israel is a choice between life and ignominious death. Those who choose the the insanity of military aggression will die in the gutter, drowning in blood, universally despised.  But this does not have to be Israel's fate.  The Zionists still have time to sober up.  Some already have:  &gt; the stupidest thing I’ve ever heard -- recently retired Mossad chief, Meir Dagan, [speaking about Israeli plans](http://www.haaretz.com/news/diplomacy-defense/former-mossad-chief-israel-air-strike-on-iran-stupidest-thing-i-have-ever-heard-1.360367) to attack Iran and start a regional war.
Symantec can be tough to deal with but you just have to get agressive.  You can always have your ticket reassigned.  The top level engineers are smart people if you can get to them.  I have worked with them twice for dedupe issues.
Are you sure that's not piss?
1. So, you'd suggest naming both apps? I kept it vague so that I'd have something to talk about in the interview.  2. I could do that. Education at the end really seems to be suggested a lot around here. But I put it at the top because it doesn't take up much space and looks like it fits up there chronologically.
Agreed.   I used to be a dickhead backpacker who never gave artists the time of day if they were affiliated with wayne, 50, or whoever the big name talent was at the time.   Now I've changed my ways and I gotta say its much better to give everyone a chance, you never know when you might be surprised. 
You could say he has pun with it.
$25 sent.  I wish that it could have been more, but times are tough. :/  Best of luck to you, Lucas!!!
You can play smash 64 online.
The man is an absolute legend. Looking forward to seeing his performance.
Well, it explains why he caused so many problems and destroyed so many things with his power tools.  That probably wasn't safe at all.
Yeah it's so hard that it's not like anyone could make software that would handle this and a web service that can be updated instantly...impossible!
Zach from Ft. Worth?
Everyone likes a good stag weekend. :)  It's a great picture.
sweet zombie jesus thank you
half of 975, which is the highest riot charges for skins and champs
Well he is saying that technically, in terms of possession.. the "double up" would come from the first possession of the game and the last possession of the first quarter.  Nall makes an excellent point about momentum though.
Small turbines are inefficient.  And surgeons aren't aero engineers.
[It's ah, bigger than, ah.. [ahem] ..you know, a normal hat.](http://i.imgur.com/sDCyU.jpg)
That's frightening.  But your article doesn't say that anywhere.
WOW!!! 
December 19th
One of my most favorite books. So glad it's in ebook format. But I can truly understand Ray Bradbury's disdain for a non-paper book -- Especially for Fahrenheit 451. Ray Bradbury is an amazing author. I have yet to read a book of his that I didn't like. Be as well as you can for as long as you can Ray Bradbury! 
West Allis, Wisconsin (near Milwaukee). It would work if we had a time machine; I live within walking distance of [here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wisconsin_State_Fair_Park):  &gt;It hosted the NFL's Green Bay Packers from 1934 to 1951 when the team played in Milwaukee. The 1939 NFL championship game was played here. 
But sometimes it leads to hilarity, ie psychics 
I was actually thinking about how stiff, graphically boring, and just plain ugly the the *classic* versions are. I've been reading comics for 35 years, and I don't know why, but something about Kirby's art has always made me cringe.
wait are you really a person? or did you just put that in yourself?
Nuh uh.
Cliche I know, but dude, thanks for your service. Seriously. You're the man. 
He nails that approachable charm thing ladies like right into the wall, or so goes the explanation.
No, don't do it. Sounds like she's a little bored in the relationship. Try experimenting with sex toys. You don't have to spend alot. Try some books on different positions. Try anything just not open relationship. 
Don't forget the spare bowl of candy beans!
Are you asking me to provide a source as to where the Catholic Church has claimed these things?
I, personally, prefer slices
Guess who wins?
I don't think tee-shirts are historically accurate, but I'll agree it's gross.
bluhh *\*puts down coffee\** fine... /fap ;O
An once of hush weed. Worth it.
Just thinking about it, even if I don't have an unused adaptor, using a vlan interface on a currently used private network adapter* should work the same way (terminating it to nowhere so vMotion check passes).  I do currently have the ability to create vlans between the machines, this is what I'm going to do for now, but I'll continue to investigate the options for doing this across a non layer2 setup, might be helpful to others too :-)   Thanks for the assistance.  *private being a network I manage so don't have to worry about anyone else getting access to the vlan accidentally.
I am the other way I think Angelina Jolie is hideously unattractive. She seems like well put together woman who does alot of good in the world and she seems exceptionally intelligent but she hurts my eyes. 
Never mind - I've figured it out to make it 480p. Crisp 480p is better than grainy 720, right? Thanks very much for all your help!
God bless you, kind sir!
That looks right, too. You say this happens on Chrome and Firefox. Did you try it on Safari? Do you have any Chrome or Firefox extensions installed?
I said "Yes, I could tell."
I swear I listen to Beacon five times a day. That starting verse just slays me.
I figure bartenders ignore you to attend the larger number of people, to maximize their tips for the night - they lost my tip as a casualty in doing so.  No big deal and nothing personal, but they made the choice.  
That was my other guess. Hello fellow New mexican redditor. What the hell is that in ur tree? A cat? Raccoon? Coyote?
Awwww :( that sucks!
your girlfriend must be happy :)
Top of the world, stoner's rock and skyline blvd at night
I expect lots of meme worthy pictures 
a true scientist never rejects any theory. one is just more probable than another  Edit:  also... intellegent design and evolution are not exactly mutually exclusive concepts.  do cars, computers, and cell-phones not evolve with time? 
"He willed himself to remain calm and follow the plan."
meh, it'd still taste delicious!
It's beyond my comprehension. I really don't understand how someone with such brilliant ideas can become such a small person over some fictional bullshit. 
